Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1611.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The title of the act of November 6, 1987 (P.L.381, No.79), known as the Older Adults Protective Services Act, is amended to read:AN ACTRelating to the protection of the abused[, neglected, exploited or abandoned elderly; establishing] older adults; providing for a uniform Statewide reporting and investigative system 12345678910111213141516171819202122 for suspected abuse[, neglect, exploitation or abandonment] of [the elderly] older adults; providing protective services; providing for funding; and making repeals.Section 2. Chapter 1 of the act is repealed:[CHAPTER 1PRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Older Adults Protective Services Act.Section 102. Legislative policy.It is declared the policy of the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania that older adults who lack the capacity to protect themselves and are at imminent risk of abuse, neglect, exploitation or abandonment shall have access to and be provided with services necessary to protect their health, safety and welfare. It is not the purpose of this act to place restrictions upon the personal liberty of incapacitated older adults, but this act should be liberally construed to assure the availability of protective services to all older adults in need of them. Such services shall safeguard the rights of incapacitated older adults while protecting them from abuse, neglect, exploitation and abandonment. It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide for the detection and reduction, correction or elimination of abuse, neglect, exploitation and abandonment, and to establish a program of protective services for older adults in need of them.Section 103. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abandonment." The desertion of an older adult by a 20250HB1611PN1925 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 caretaker."Abuse." The occurrence of one or more of the following acts:(1) The infliction of injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation or punishment with resulting physical harm, pain or mental anguish.(2) The willful deprivation by a caretaker of goods or services which are necessary to maintain physical or mental health.(3) Sexual harassment, rape or abuse, as defined in the act of October 7, 1976 (P.L.1090, No.218), known as the Protection From Abuse Act.No older adult shall be found to be abused solely on the grounds of environmental factors which are beyond the control of the older adult or the caretaker, such as inadequate housing, furnishings, income, clothing or medical care."Administrator." The person responsible for the administration of a facility. The term includes a person responsible for employment decisions or an independent contractor."Agency." The local provider of protective services, which is the area agency on aging or the agency designated by the area agency on aging to provide protective services in the area agency's planning and service area."Care." Services provided to meet a person's need for personal care or health care. Services may include homemaker services, assistance with activities of daily living, physical therapy, occupational therapy, speech therapy, medical social services, home-care aide services, companion-care services, private duty nursing services, respiratory therapy, intravenous 20250HB1611PN1925 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 therapy, in-home dialysis and durable medical equipment services, which are routinely provided unsupervised and which require interaction with the care-dependent person. The term does not include durable medical equipment delivery."Care-dependent individual." An adult who, due to physical or cognitive disability or impairment, requires assistance to meet needs for food, shelter, clothing, personal care or health care."Caretaker." An individual or institution that has assumed the responsibility for the provision of care needed to maintain the physical or mental health of an older adult. This responsibility may arise voluntarily, by contract, by receipt of payment for care, as a result of family relationship, or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction. It is not the intent of this act to impose responsibility on any individual if such responsibility would not otherwise exist in law."Client assessment." Social, physical and psychological findings along with a description of the person's current resources and needs."Court." A court of common pleas or a district magistrate court, where applicable."Department." The Department of Aging of the Commonwealth."Employee." An individual who is employed by a facility. The term includes contract employees who have direct contact with residents or unsupervised access to their personal living quarters. The term includes any person who is employed or who enters into a contractual relationship to provide care to a care-dependent individual for monetary consideration in the individual's place of residence."Exploitation." An act or course of conduct by a caretaker 20250HB1611PN1925 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or other person against an older adult or an older adult's resources, without the informed consent of the older adult or with consent obtained through misrepresentation, coercion or threats of force, that results in monetary, personal or other benefit, gain or profit for the perpetrator or monetary or personal loss to the older adult."Facility." Any of the following:(1) A domiciliary care home as defined in section 2202-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) A home health care agency.(3) A long-term care nursing facility as defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act.(4) An older adult daily living center as defined in section 2 of the act of July 11, 1990 (P.L.499, No.118), known as the Older Adult Daily Living Centers Licensing Act.(5) A personal care home as defined in section 1001 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Public Welfare Code."Home health care agency." Any of the following:(1) A home health care organization or agency licensed by the Department of Health.(2) A public or private agency or organization, or part of an agency or organization, which provides care to a care-dependent individual in the individual's place of residence."Intimidation." An act or omission by any person or entity toward another person which is intended to, or with knowledge that the act or omission will, obstruct, impede, impair, prevent or interfere with the administration of this act or any law 20250HB1611PN1925 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intended to protect older adults from mistreatment."Law enforcement official." Any of the following:(1) A police officer of a municipality.(2) A district attorney.(3) The Pennsylvania State Police."Neglect." The failure to provide for oneself or the failure of a caretaker to provide goods or services essential to avoid a clear and serious threat to physical or mental health. No older adult who does not consent to the provision of protective services shall be found to be neglected solely on the grounds of environmental factors which are beyond the control of the older adult or the caretaker, such as inadequate housing, furnishings, income, clothing or medical care."Older adult." A person within the jurisdiction of the Commonwealth who is 60 years of age or older."Older adult in need of protective services." An incapacitated older adult who is unable to perform or obtain services that are necessary to maintain physical or mental health, for whom there is no responsible caretaker and who is at imminent risk of danger to his person or property."Protective services." Those activities, resources and supports provided to older adults under this act to detect, prevent, reduce or eliminate abuse, neglect, exploitation and abandonment."Protective setting." A setting chosen by the agency where services can be provided in the least restrictive environment to protect the physical and mental well-being of the older adult."Recipient." An individual who receives care, services or treatment in or from a facility."Secretary." The Secretary of Aging of the Commonwealth.20250HB1611PN1925 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Serious bodily injury." Injury which creates a substantial risk of death or which causes serious permanent disfigurement or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a body member or organ."Serious physical injury." An injury that:(1) causes a person severe pain; or(2) significantly impairs a person's physical functioning, either temporarily or permanently."Service plan." A written plan developed by the agency on the basis of comprehensive assessment of a client's need which describes identified needs, goals to be achieved and specific services to support goal attainment, with regular follow-up and predetermined reassessment of client progress. Specific services to support goal attainment may include, but is not limited to, homemaker services, home-delivered meals, attendant care, other in-home services, emergency shelter or food, legal aid services, transportation and other such services. Service plans are cooperatively developed by the agency staff, the client or the client's appointed guardian, and other family members when appropriate. The plan shall also address, where applicable, special needs of other members of the household unit as they may affect the older adult's need for protective services."Sexual abuse." Intentionally, knowingly or recklessly causing or attempting to cause rape, involuntary deviate sexual intercourse, sexual assault, statutory sexual assault, aggravated indecent assault, indecent assault or incest.]Section 3. The act is amended by adding chapters to read:CHAPTER 1-APRELIMINARY PROVISIONSSection 101-A. Short title. 20250HB1611PN1925 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 This act shall be known and may be cited as the Older Adults Protective Services Act.Section 102-A. Definitions. The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Abandonment." The desertion of an older adult by a caregiver."Abuse." As follows: (1) The occurrence of one or more of the following acts: (i) The knowing infliction of injury, unreasonable confinement, intimidation or punishment with resulting physical harm, pain or mental anguish.(ii) The willful deprivation by a caregiver of goods or services that are necessary to maintain physical or mental health.(iii) Sexual abuse. (iv) Abuse as defined in 23 Pa.C.S. § 6102 (relating to definitions).(v) Exploitation. (vi) Financial exploitation. (vii) Neglect. (viii) Abandonment. (2) The term does not include an environmental factor that is beyond the control of an older adult or a caregiver, including the inadequacy of housing, furnishings, income, clothing or medical care."Administrator." The individual responsible for the administration of a facility. The term includes an individual responsible for employment decisions at a facility or an 20250HB1611PN1925 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 independent contractor of a facility."Applicant." An individual who submits an application to be considered for employment by a facility."Area agency on aging." The local agency or the local agency's agent designated by the department within a planning and service area to administer the delivery of older adult protective services."Assessment." Comprehensive social, physical, cognitive and psychological findings along with a description of an individual's current resources and needs."Care." Services provided to meet an older adult's need for personal care or physical or behavioral health care. The term includes homemaker services, assistance with activities of daily living, physical therapy, occupational therapy, speech therapy, medical social services, home-care aide services, companion-care services, private duty nursing services, respiratory therapy, intravenous therapy, in-home dialysis and durable medical equipment services, that are routinely provided unsupervised and require interaction with an older adult. The term does not include durable medical equipment delivery."Caregiver." An individual or institution that has assumed the responsibility for the provision of care needed to maintain the physical or mental health of an older adult. The responsibility may arise voluntarily, by contract, by receipt of payment for care, as a result of family relationship or by order of a court of competent jurisdiction."Court." A court of common pleas or a district magistrate court, where applicable."Department." The Department of Aging of the Commonwealth. "Designated representative of a financial institution." An 20250HB1611PN1925 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 individual who:(1) is entitled to immunity from suit for disclosing suspected financial exploitation by 12 U.S.C. § 3423 (relating to immunity from suit for disclosure of financial exploitation of senior citizens); and(2) is designated by a financial institution as the individual responsible for providing information to an area agency on aging, law enforcement agency or the department."Employee." The term includes: (1) An individual who is employed by a facility. (2) An individual who enters into a contractual relationship with a facility and has direct contact with residents or unsupervised access to their personal living quarters.(3) An individual who is employed or enters into a contractual relationship to provide care to an older adult for monetary consideration in the older adult's place of residence."Exploitation." An act or course of conduct by a caregiver or other person against an older adult or an older adult's resources without the informed consent of the older adult or with consent or authorization obtained through misrepresentation, undue influence, coercion or threats of force that results in monetary or personal loss to the older adult. The term includes financial exploitation."Facility." The term includes the following: (1) A domiciliary care home as defined in section 2202-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) An assisted living residence as defined in section 20250HB1611PN1925 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 1001 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code.(3) A home health care agency as defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act.(4) An intermediate care facility for individuals with an intellectual disability.(5) A long-term care nursing facility as defined in section 802.1 of the Health Care Facilities Act.(6) An older adult daily living center as defined in section 2 of the act of July 11, 1990 (P.L.499, No.118), known as the Older Adult Daily Living Centers Licensing Act.(7) A personal care home as defined in section 1001 of the Human Services Code.(8) An organization or group of people that uses public funds and is paid, in part, to provide care, care coordination or support to older adults in a licensed or unlicensed setting.(9) A residential treatment facility. (10) A hospital. "Fiduciary." A person legally authorized to act on behalf of an older adult."Financial exploitation." As defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3922.1 (relating to financial exploitation of an older adult or care-dependent person)."Financial institution." Any of the following conducting business in this Commonwealth:(1) A depository institution as defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1813(c) (relating to definitions).(2) A Federal credit union or State credit union as 20250HB1611PN1925 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1752 (relating to definitions), including an institution-affiliated party of a credit union as defined in 12 U.S.C. § 1786(r) (relating to te rmination of insured credit union status and cease and desist orders and removal or suspension from office and procedure) . (3) A financial institution under 31 CFR Subt. B Ch. X Pt. 1020 (relating to rules for banks) that is required to file a suspicious activity report.(4) A person subject to supervision by the Department of Banking and Securities or comparable Federal or State bank supervisory or regulatory authority."Financial institution employee." An individual employed by a financial institution that has either: (1) direct contact with an older adult; or (2) access to or direct knowledge of an older adult's financial records or accounts with the financial institution."Financial transaction." The term includes an exchange or transfer of money, title, assets or any type of monetary instrument through any means including cash, credit cards, debit cards, checks, electronic or wire transfers or any of the following:(1) A transfer or a request to transfer or disburse funds, money or assets, or any other tangible item of value in an account . (2) A request to initiate a wire transfer, initiate an automated clearinghouse transfer or issue a money order, cashier's check or official check.(3) A request to negotiate a check or other negotiable instrument.(4) A request to change the ownership of, or access to, 20250HB1611PN1925 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 an account.(5) A request to sell or transfer a security or other asset , or a request to affix a medallion stamp or provide a form of guarantee or endorsement in connection with an attempt to sell or transfer a security or other asset.(6) A request for a loan, extension of credit or draw on a line of credit.(7) A request to encumber movable or immovable property. (8) A request to designate or change the designation of a beneficiary to receive property or a benefit or contractual right.(9) A request for access to a safe deposit box.(10) Except as authorized by this chapter, a request for access regarding nonpublic information regarding an older adult."Health care provider." Any of the following: (1) A health care facility as defined under section 103 of the Health Care Facilities Act.(2) A person licensed, certified or otherwise regulated to provide health care services under the laws of this Commonwealth."Hospital." An institution licensed by the Department of Health that has an organized medical staff established for the purpose of providing to inpatients, by or under the supervision of physicians, diagnostic and therapeutic services for the care of persons who are injured, disabled, pregnant, diseased, sick or mentally ill or rehabilitation services for the rehabilitation of persons who are injured, disabled, pregnant, diseased, sick or mentally ill. The term includes a facility for the diagnosis and treatment of disorders within the scope of 20250HB1611PN1925 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 specific medical specialties. The term does not include a facility caring exclusively for behavioral health patients or a facility whose inpatients are predominantly individuals under 18 years of age."Imminent risk." An immediate or impending action, condition or situation that poses a direct threat to an older adult's health or life absent intervention without delay for any reason upon discovery of the action, condition or situation."Intentionally." As specified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 302 (relating to general requirements of culpability)."Intimidation." An act or omission by a person toward another person intended to threaten or with the knowledge that the act or omission will frighten, obstruct, impede, impair, prevent or interfere with the administration of this act or other law intended to protect older adults from mistreatment."Knowingly." As specified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 302. "Law enforcement agency." The Office of Attorney General, a district attorney's office or an agency that employs a law enforcement official."Law enforcement official." Any of the following: (1) An individual who is employed as a police officer and holds a current certificate under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 21 Subch. D (relating to municipal police education and training).(2) A district attorney or assistant district attorney. (3) An officer of the Pennsylvania State Police. (4) The Attorney General or an agent or deputy of the Attorney General.(5) A sheriff or deputy sheriff. "Least restrictive alternative." The least intrusive 20250HB1611PN1925 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 interventions, services or environment that can effectively and safely address an older adult's needs."Mandatory reporter." Any of the following: (1) An administrator or employee of a facility. (2) A health care provider. (3) A person licensed, certified or otherwise regulated to provide health care services under the laws of this Commonwealth.(4) An administrator or employee of an area agency on aging.(5) A law enforcement official. "Neglect." The failure to provide for oneself or the failure of a caregiver or fiduciary to provide goods, care or services essential to avoid a clear and serious threat to the physical or mental health of an older adult. An older adult who does not consent to the provision of protective services may not be found to be neglected solely on the grounds of environmental factors that are beyond the control of the older adult or the caregiver, including inadequate housing, furnishings, income, clothing or medical care."Older adult." An individual who is within the jurisdiction of this Commonwealth and is at least 60 years of age."Older adult in need of protective services." An older adult who, because of one or more functional limitations, needs the assistance of another person to perform or obtain services that are necessary to maintain physical or mental health, for whom there is no responsible caregiver and there is a risk of harm to their person or property or they are at imminent risk under section 404-A(a)." Perso n who is authorized to have access to the older adult's 20250HB1611PN1925 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 account." The term includes:(1) An authorized contact provided by an older adult to a financial institution, authorized signatory or beneficiary on an older adult's account.(2) A fiduciary authorized to manage some or all of the financial affairs of an older adult.(3) A co-owner of an account or other person authorized to transact business on an older adult's account.(4) An attorney or financial professional known to represent or have represented or to assist in the management of the financial affairs of an older adult."Protective services." The activities, resources and supports provided to older adults under this act to detect, address, prevent, remedy, reduce or eliminate abuse."Recipient." An older adult who receives care, services or treatment in or from a facility or caregiver."Risk of harm." The strong likelihood that an older adult will experience an action, condition, situation, injury or other outcome that is adverse or detrimental."Secretary." The Secretary of Aging of the Commonwealth."Serious bodily injury." Injury that: (1) creates a substantial risk of death; or (2) causes serious disfigurement of a body part or organ, protracted loss or impairment of the function of a body part or organ."Serious injury." An injury that: (1) causes a person severe pain; or (2) significantly impairs an individual's physical or mental functioning, either temporarily or permanently."Service plan." A written comprehensive assessment by an 20250HB1611PN1925 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 area agency on aging of an older adult that includes a person-centered and trauma-informed approach that identifies needs, goals to be achieved or maintained and specific services designed to support the older adult's physical and mental health."Sexual abuse." Nonconsensual sexual interaction, including a touching or nontouching act, with an older adult." Substantiated perpetrator." A person determined, based on a protective services investigation, to have committed abuse of an older adult."Suspicious death." An older adult's death that occurs during an active protective services case where there is a potential nexus between the injury inflicted and the death of the older adult."Willfully." As specified in 18 Pa.C.S. § 302. Section 103-A. Intent. It is not the intent of this act to impose responsibility on an individual if the responsibility would not otherwise exist in law.CHAPTER 2-ADUTIES OF DEPARTMENTSection 201-A. Public education. The department shall conduct an ongoing public education and outreach campaign to older adults and the general public that is designed to promote and create awareness about the reporting of and protection from abuse of older adults.Section 202-A. (Reserved). Section 203-A. Training. (a) Standards.--The department shall establish minimum training requirements and ongoing education for all area agency 20250HB1611PN1925 - 17 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 on aging employees to ensure that the employees possess the competency, knowledge and skills necessary for the effective provision of protective services.(b) Mandatory reporters.--The department shall establish a training program for mandatory reporters regarding reporting requirements under this act.Section 204-A. Confidentiality. The department shall establish procedures which shall be used by an area agency on aging, its designees and its protective services providers to ensure the privacy of older adults receiving services and the confidentiality of records.Section 205-A. Schedule and annual plan. (a) Establishment.--The department shall establish a schedule for the submission and approval of the plans associated with the development of training provided in section 203-A.(b) Protective services annual plan.-- (1) An area agency on aging shall develop a protective services annual plan that describes the local implementation of this act, including the organization, staffing, mode of operations and financing of protective services and the provisions made for the purchase of services, interagency relations, interagency agreements, service referral mechanisms and locus of responsibility for cases with multiservice agency needs.(2) The plan shall include a list of each public or private entity that has been identified by the area agency on aging as having substantial contact with older adults who are potentially in need of protective services or persons substantiated as abusers against older adults.(3) The area agency on aging shall submit the list to 20250HB1611PN1925 - 18 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the department for purposes of the public education campaign under section 201-A.Section 206-A. Waiver application availability. The department shall develop a standardized application process for waivers submitted under section 702-A(b). The department shall make the process publicly available.Section 207-A. Reporting. The department shall annually submit to the General Assembly a report on the training program established under section 203-A and services performed. The report shall include, at minimum, statistical data on abuse, the waiver process and training practices. The department shall make the report publicly available.Section 4. Chapter 3 of the act is repealed:[CHAPTER 3ADMINISTRATIONSection 301. Duties of department and area agencies on aging.(a) Public information and interdepartmental consultation.--The department shall conduct an ongoing campaign designed to inform and educate older adults, professionals and the general public about the need for an availability of protective services under this chapter. The department shall consult with other departments of the Commonwealth on the design and implementation of the ongoing public awareness campaign. The department shall also consider the concerns of area agencies on aging and the entities identified by them under subsection (c).(b) Staff training.--The department shall establish minimum standards of training and experience which protective services providers funded by the department shall be required to follow in the selection and assignment of staff for the provision of 20250HB1611PN1925 - 19 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protective services.(c) Protective services plans.--Each area agency on aging shall include a protective services plan as part of its annual plan. The plan shall describe the local implementation of this chapter, including the organization, staffing, mode of operations and financing of protective services, as well as the provisions made for purchase of services, interagency relations, interagency agreements, service referral mechanisms and locus of responsibility for cases with multiservice agency needs. The description of the methods that will be used by the agency, its designees and its service providers to assure the privacy of older adults receiving services and the confidentiality of all records shall be established by the department. The department shall establish a schedule for the submission and approval of the plans. The plan shall include a list of all entities, whether public or private, that have been identified by the area agency on aging as having substantial contact with potential victims or perpetrators of abuse, neglect, exploitation and abandonment. This list shall be submitted to the department for purposes of the public information campaign under subsection (a).Section 302. Reporting; protection from retaliation; immunity.(a) Reporting.--Any person having reasonable cause to believe that an older adult is in need of protective services may report such information to the agency which is the local provider of protective services. Where applicable, reports shall comply with the provisions of Chapter 7.(b) Receiving reports.--The agency shall be capable of receiving reports of older adults in need of protective services 24 hours a day, seven days a week (including holidays). This 20250HB1611PN1925 - 20 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 capability may include the use of a local emergency response system or a crisis intervention agency, provided that access can be made to a protective services caseworker in appropriate emergency situations as set forth in regulations promulgated by the department. All reports received orally under this section shall be reduced to writing immediately by the person who receives the report.(c) Retaliatory action; penalty.--Any person making a report or cooperating with the agency, including providing testimony in any administrative or judicial proceeding, and the victim shall be free from any discriminatory, retaliatory or disciplinary action by an employer or by any other person or entity. Any person who violates this subsection is subject to a civil lawsuit by the reporter or the victim wherein the reporter or victim shall recover treble compensatory damages, compensatory and punitive damages or $5,000, whichever is greater.(c.1) Intimidation; penalty.--Any person, including the victim, with knowledge sufficient to justify making a report or cooperating with the agency, including possibly providing testimony in any administrative or judicial proceeding, shall be free from any intimidation by an employer or by any other person or entity. Any person who violates this subsection is subject to civil lawsuit by the person intimidated or the victim wherein the person intimidated or the victim shall recover treble compensatory damages, compensatory and punitive damages or $5,000, whichever is greater.(d) Immunity.--Any person participating in the making of a report or who provides testimony in any administrative or judicial proceeding arising out of a report shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability on account of the report or 20250HB1611PN1925 - 21 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 testimony unless the person acted in bad faith or with malicious purpose. This immunity shall not extend to liability for acts of abuse, neglect, exploitation or abandonment, even if such acts are the subject of the report or testimony.Section 303. Investigations of reports of need for protective services.(a) Investigation.--It shall be the agency's responsibility to provide for an investigation of each report made under section 302. The investigation shall be initiated within 72 hours after the receipt of the report and shall be carried out under regulations issued by the department. These regulations shall provide for the methods of conducting investigations under this section and shall assure that steps are taken to avoid any conflict of interest between the investigator and service delivery functions. Reports and investigations under this section shall comply with Chapter 7, where applicable.(b) Investigation involving licensed facilities.--Any report concerning older adults residing in a State-licensed facility shall be investigated under procedures developed by the department in consultation with the State agency licensing such facility. If the report concerns a resident of a State-licensed facility for whom the area agency on aging provides ombudsman services, the ombudsman of the area agency on aging must be notified.(c) Unsubstantiated reports.--If, after investigation by the agency, the report is unsubstantiated, the case shall be closed and all information identifying the reporter and the alleged abuser shall be immediately deleted from all records. For purposes of substantiating a pattern of abuse, neglect, exploitation or abandonment, the name of the alleged victim and 20250HB1611PN1925 - 22 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 any information describing the alleged act of abuse, neglect, exploitation or abandonment may be maintained for a period of six months under procedures established by the department.(d) Substantiated reports.--If the report is substantiated by the agency, or if the client assessment is necessary in order to determine whether or not the report is substantiated, the agency shall provide for a timely client assessment if the older adult consents to an assessment. Upon completion of the assessment, written findings shall be prepared which shall include recommended action. This service plan shall provide for the least restrictive alternative, encouraging client self-determination and continuity of care. The service plan shall be in writing and shall include a recommended course of action, which may include the pursuit of civil or criminal remedies. If an older adult found to be in need of protective services does not consent to a client assessment or the development of a service plan, the agency may apply to the case the provisions of section 307.Section 304. Provision of services; access to records and persons.(a) Availability of protective services.--The agency shall offer protective services under any of the following conditions:(1) An older adult requests such services.(2) Another interested person requests such services on behalf of an older adult.(3) If, after investigation of a report, the agency determines the older adult is in need of such services.(b) Consent by request.--Except as provided in section 307, an individual shall receive protective services voluntarily. In no event may protective services be provided under this chapter 20250HB1611PN1925 - 23 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to any person who does not consent to such services or who, having consented, withdraws such consent, unless such services are ordered by a court, requested by a guardian of the older adult or provided under section 307. Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the agency from petitioning for the appointment of a guardian pursuant to Title 20 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes (relating to decedents, estates and fiduciaries).(c) Interference with services.--If any person interferes with the provision of services or interferes with the right of an older adult to consent to provision of services, the agency may petition the court for an order enjoining such interference.(d) Access to records.--The agency shall have access to all records relevant to:(1) Investigations of reports under section 303.(2) Assessment of client need.(3) Service planning when an older adult's need for protective services has been or is being established.(4) The delivery of services arranged for under the service plan developed by the agency to respond to an older adult's assessed need for specific services.(e) Access to persons.--The agency shall have access to older persons who have been reported to be in need of protective services in order to:(1) Investigate reports under section 303 and Chapter 7.(2) Assess client need and develop a service plan for addressing needs determined.(3) Provide for the delivery of services by the agency or other service provider arranged for under the service plan developed by the agency.(f) Denial of access to persons.--If the agency is denied 20250HB1611PN1925 - 24 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 access to an older adult reported to be in need of protective services and access is necessary to complete the investigation or the client assessment and service plan, or the delivery of needed services in order to prevent further abuse, neglect, exploitation or abandonment of the older adult reported to be in need of protective services, the agency may petition the court for an order to require the appropriate access when either of the following conditions apply:(1) The caretaker or a third party has interfered with the completion of the investigation or the client assessment and service plan or the delivery of services.(2) The agency can demonstrate that the older adult reported to be in need of protective services is denying access because of coercion, extortion or justifiable fear of future abuse, neglect, or exploitation or abandonment.(g) Access by consent.--The agency's access to confidential records held by other agencies or individuals and the agency's access to an older adult reported to be in need of protective services shall require the consent of the older adult or a court-appointed guardian except as provided for under this section or section 307.(h) Denial of access to records.--If the agency is denied access to records necessary for the completion of a proper investigation of a report or a client assessment and service plan, or the delivery of needed services in order to prevent further abuse, neglect, exploitation or abandonment of the older adult reported to be in need of protective services, the agency may petition the court of common pleas for an order requiring the appropriate access when either of the following conditions apply:20250HB1611PN1925 - 25 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The older adult has provided written consent for any confidential records to be disclosed and the keeper of the records denies access.(2) The agency can demonstrate that the older adult is denying access to records because of incompetence, coercion, extortion or justifiable fear of future abuse, neglect, exploitation or abandonment.Section 305. Immunity from civil and criminal liability.In the absence of willful misconduct or gross negligence, the agency, the director, employees of the agency, protective services workers or employees of the department shall not be civilly or criminally liable for any decision or action or resulting consequence of decisions or action when acting under and according to the provisions of this chapter.Section 306. Confidentiality of records.(a) General rule.--Information contained in reports, records of investigation, client assessment and service plans shall be considered confidential and shall be maintained under regulations promulgated by the department to safeguard confidentiality. Except as provided below, this information shall not be disclosed to anyone outside the agency other than to a court of competent jurisdiction or pursuant to a court order.(b) Limited access to the agency's protective services records.--(1) In the event that an investigation by the agency results in a report of criminal conduct, law enforcement officials shall have access to all relevant records maintained by the agency or the department.(2) In arranging specific services to carry out service 20250HB1611PN1925 - 26 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 plans, the agency may disclose to appropriate service providers such information as may be necessary to initiate the delivery of services.(3) A subject of a report made under section 302 may receive, upon written request, all information contained in the report except that prohibited from being disclosed by paragraph (4).(4) The release of information that would identify the person who made a report of suspected abuse, neglect, exploitation or abandonment or person who cooperated in a subsequent investigation, is hereby prohibited unless the secretary can determine that such a release will not be detrimental to the safety of such person.(5) When the department is involved in the hearing of an appeal by a subject of a report made under section 302, the appropriate department staff shall have access to all information in the report record relevant to the appeal.(6) For the purposes of monitoring agency performance, appropriate staff of the department may access agency protective services records.Section 307. Involuntary intervention by emergency court order.(a) Emergency petition.--Where there was clear and convincing evidence that if protective services are not provided, the person to be protected is at imminent risk of death or serious physical harm, the agency may petition the court for an emergency order to provide the necessary services. The courts of common pleas of each judicial district shall ensure that a judge or district justice is available on a 24-hour-a-day, 365-day-a-year basis to accept and decide on petitions for an emergency court order under this section 20250HB1611PN1925 - 27 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 whenever the agency determines that a delay until normal court hours would significantly increase the danger the older adult faces.(b) Limited order.--The court, after finding clear and convincing evidence of the need for an emergency order, shall order only such services as are necessary to remove the conditions creating the established need.(c) Right to counsel.--In order to protect the rights of an older adult for whom protective services are being ordered, an emergency court order under this section shall provide that the older adult has the right to legal counsel. If the older adult is unable to provide for counsel, such counsel shall be appointed by the court.(d) Forcible entry.--Where it is necessary to forcibly enter premises after obtaining a court order, a peace officer may do so, accompanied by a representative of the agency.(e) Health and safety requirements.--The agency shall take reasonable steps to assure that while the person is receiving services under an emergency court order, the health and safety needs of any of the person's dependents are met and that personal property and the dwelling the person occupies are secure.(f) Exclusion of remedy.--Nothing in this chapter shall be interpreted to deny any older adult access to the emergency medical services or police protection that would be provided to anyone, regardless of age, in similar circumstances.Section 308. Individual rights.(a) Rights of protective services clients.--The agency shall observe the following minimum requirements to safeguard the rights of an older adult who is reported to be in need of 20250HB1611PN1925 - 28 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protective services:(1) The agency shall discreetly notify the older person during the investigation that a report has been made and shall provide the person with a brief summary of the nature of the report.(2) As provided under section 306(b)(3), the older adult may request, and the agency shall provide, additional information contained in the report.(3) Any denial of services by the department or an authorized agency under this chapter may be appealed according to the provisions of the rules and regulations issued by the department under Article XXII-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(4) Nothing in this act shall limit the right of any older person to file a petition pursuant to the act of October 7, 1976 (P.L.1090, No.218), known as the Protection From Abuse Act.(b) Rights of alleged abusers.--An individual who is alleged in a protective services report to be a perpetrator of the abuse, neglect, exploitation or abandonment of an older adult shall be entitled to the following if the report is substantiated by the agency:(1) Such an individual shall be notified by the agency at the conclusion of the investigation of the report that allegations have been made and shall be given a brief summary of the allegations.(2) As provided under section 306(b)(3), the alleged perpetrator may request, and the agency shall provide, additional information contained in the report.20250HB1611PN1925 - 29 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) An alleged perpetrator is entitled to file an appeal with the department under 1 Pa. Code Part II (relating to general rules of administrative practice and procedure) to challenge the agency's finding resulting from the investigation of a report made under section 303.Section 309. Financial obligations; liabilities and payments.All individuals receiving services and all agencies providing services under this chapter shall comply with the following provisions regarding liability for the payment of services:(1) Funding to provide or make available protective services under this chapter shall not supplant any public and private entitlements or resources for which persons receiving protective services under this chapter are or may be eligible, and shall not be available until such persons have exhausted their eligibility and receipt of benefits under said public and private entitlements or resources.(2) Funding available to local protective services agencies under this chapter may be used to cover the costs of activities including, but not limited to, the following:(i) Administering protective services plans required under section 301(c).(ii) Receiving and maintaining records of reports of abuse under section 302.(iii) Conducting investigations of reported abuse under section 303.(iv) Carrying out client assessments and developing service plans under section 303.(v) Petitioning the court under sections 304 and 307.(vi) Providing emergency involuntary intervention 20250HB1611PN1925 - 30 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under section 307.(vii) Arranging for available services needed to carry out service plans, which may include, as appropriate, arranging for services for other household members in order to reduce, correct or eliminate abuse, neglect, exploitation or abandonment of an older adult.(viii) Purchasing, on a temporary basis, services determined by a service plan to be necessary to reduce, correct or eliminate abuse, neglect, exploitation or abandonment of an older adult when such services are not available within the existing resources of the agency or other appropriate provider. Purchase of services under this provision is limited to a 30-day period which may be renewed with adequate justification under regulations promulgated by the department.(3) The obligation of the Commonwealth and the counties to provide funds to the department or any agency for services provided pursuant to this chapter shall be entirely discharged by the appropriations made to the department or an agency. Provided that the agency has met its responsibility under the law, no action at law or equity shall be instituted in any court to require the department, any agency, county or the Commonwealth to provide benefits or services under this chapter for which appropriations from the Commonwealth or counties are not available.(4) Protective services clients receiving the same services provided to others under an agency service plan shall not be required to pay a fee for any services not subject to cost sharing for other older adults.Section 310. Regulations; enforcement.20250HB1611PN1925 - 31 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Promulgation of regulations.--The department shall promulgate the rules and regulations to carry out this chapter and shall be responsible for presenting to the General Assembly annually a report on the program and services performed.(b) Enforcement.--This chapter shall be enforced only after promulgation of regulations by the department, which shall occur no later than 12 months following passage of this chapter, except that section 301 shall apply when the area agency on aging certifies to the department that it is prepared to fulfill its responsibilities. The certification shall be made within 90 days following promulgation of regulations.Section 311. Funds for payment of administration of chapter.Funds necessary to administer this chapter shall be provided by annual appropriation by the General Assembly.]Section 5. The act is amended by adding chapters to read:CHAPTER 3-ADUTIES OF AREA AGENCIES ON AGINGSection 301-A. Receipt of reports. An area agency on aging shall receive at all times, electronically and orally, a report of an older adult in need of protective services. The report must be documented in a manner prescribed by the department.Section 302-A. Investigations. (a) Duty to conduct.-- (1) An area agency on aging shall investigate a report, in accordance with regulations issued by the department, to determine if an older adult is in need of protective services.(2) The regulations shall provide for the methods of conducting investigations and shall ensure that steps are 20250HB1611PN1925 - 32 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 taken to avoid a conflict of interest.(3) To the extent permitted by law, the department may exchange information with Federal agencies or the Commonwealth as necessary to ensure the health, safety and welfare of an older adult and protect an older adult from financial exploitation under section 603-A.(b) Closure.--Upon closure of a case, the area agency on aging shall retain information for a minimum of six months under procedures established by the department.(c) Timely assessment.--(1) If a report is substantiated by an area agency on aging or an assessment is necessary in order to determine whether or not the report is substantiated, the area agency on aging shall provide for a timely assessment, provided the older adult consents to an assessment.(2) Upon completion of the assessment, the area agency on aging shall prepare written findings and recommended action. The service plan shall:(i) provide for the least restrictive alternative, encouraging self-determination and continuity of care;(ii) be in writing; and(iii) include a recommended course of action that may include the pursuit of civil or criminal remedies.(3) If an older adult found to be in need of protective services does not consent to an assessment or the development of a service plan, the area agency on aging may apply section 404-A to the case.(d) Environmental factors.--An older adult may not be found to be abused solely on the grounds of environmental factors that are beyond the control of the older adult or caregiver, 20250HB1611PN1925 - 33 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 including inadequate housing, furnishings, income, clothing or medical care.Section 303-A. Investigations involving facilities. (a) Duty to conduct.--If a report under section 301-A concerns a facility, the area agency on aging shall notify the local ombudsman and the licensing agency and the investigation concerning the facility shall be coordinated with the licensing agency and conducted under procedures developed by the department in consultation with the Commonwealth agency with oversight authority for the facility.(b) Duty of facility.--The facility shall take reasonable steps to protect older adults following receipt of a report of suspected abuse involving an employee, including a plan of supervision or suspension of the employee.Section 304-A. Investigations involving law enforcement officials.(a) Coordination.--To the extent possible, law enforcement officials, an area agency on aging and other mandatory reporters shall coordinate respective investigations and shall advise each other and provide applicable additional information on an ongoing basis.(b) Notice to law enforcement officials.--Upon receipt of a report of any of the following, the area agency on aging shall immediately notify a law enforcement official:(1) Suspicious death. (2) Serious bodily injury. (3) Serious injury. (4) Rape, involuntarily deviate sexual intercourse, sexual assault, institutional sexual assault, statutory sexual assault, aggravate indecent assault, indecent assault 20250HB1611PN1925 - 34 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or incest as defined by 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses).(c) Actions following referral.-- (1) Following a referral to a law enforcement official, the area agency on aging shall contact the law enforcement official to obtain information about any action taken and the outcome, including any decision regarding criminal charges, and the law enforcement official shall provide the information to the extent that the information is available.(2) An area agency on aging shall report the information under paragraph (1) to the department in a manner prescribed by the department.Section 305-A. Access to older adults. (a) Power of area agency on aging.--(1) An area agency on aging shall have access to an older adult who has been reported to be in need of protective services in order to:(i) Investigate a report. (ii) Assess needs of the older adult and develop a service plan for addressing the needs.(iii) Provide for the delivery of services by the area agency on aging or other protective services provider under the service plan.(2) If the area agency on aging is denied access to an older adult reported to be in need of protective services, the area agency on aging may petition the court for an order to require the appropriate access when either of the following conditions apply:(i) The caregiver or a third party has interfered with the completion of the investigation, the assessment 20250HB1611PN1925 - 35 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 and service plan or the delivery of services.(ii) The area agency on aging demonstrates the older adult reported to be in need of protective services is being denied access because of undue influence, coercion, extortion or justifiable fear of future abuse.(b) Petition.--The area agency on aging may petition the court for an order to require any of the following:(1) Access to the older adult. (2) A physical health evaluation of the older adult. (3) A behavioral health evaluation of the older adult. Section 306-A. Access to records. (a) Area agency on aging access.--An area agency on aging shall, with the consent of an older adult, have access to all records for the purposes of:(1) Assessing the older adult's need for services. (2) Planning and delivery of services. (3) Investigating a report relating to the older adult. (b) Refusal.--If the area agency on aging is denied access to records necessary for the completion of a proper investigation of a report, assessment or service plan or the delivery of needed services in order to prevent further abuse of the older adult reported to be in need of protective services, the area agency on aging may petition the court of common pleas for an order requiring the appropriate access when either of the following conditions apply:(1) The older adult has provided written consent for confidential records to be disclosed and the keeper of the records denies access.(2) The area agency on aging demonstrates that the older adult is being denied access to records because the older 20250HB1611PN1925 - 36 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adult is unable to give informed consent due to cognitive impairment or because of undue influence, coercion, extortion or justifiable fear of future abuse.(c) Request of certain records.-- (1) If an area agency on aging reasonably believes records from a Commonwealth agency, private organization, financial institution, fiduciary, medical institution and practitioner or person reasonably suspected of engaging in or facilitating the abuse of an older adult, are necessary to complete an investigation, assessment, or service plan, the area agency on aging shall request in written form the records, and the records shall be made available to the area agency on aging, unless the disclosure is prohibited by any other provision of Federal or State law.(2) Except as provided by a court order, access to a financial record shall be limited to a record relating to the most recent financial transaction or financial transactions that may comprise financial exploitation, not to exceed 60 calendar days prior to the first financial transaction reported and 60 calendar days after the last financial transaction reported.(d) Medical records.--To facilitate an area agency on aging's protective services investigation, assessment or service plan under this subsection, a medical institution and practitioner shall provide an older adult's medical records within five business days, in accordance with Federal and State law, upon receipt of written consent.(e) Compensation.--The area agency on aging or the department may compensate a person requested or ordered to provide records to the area agency on aging for the reasonable 20250HB1611PN1925 - 37 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 costs of producing records in a manner consistent with the requirements of 12 U.S.C. § 3415 (relating to cost reimbursement).Section 307-A. Rights of older adults. (a) Notification.--An area agency on aging shall discreetly notify an older adult during an investigation that a report has been made and shall provide the older adult with a brief summary of the nature of the report.(b) Information.-- (1) As provided in section 405-A, an older adult who is the subject of a report, or the older adult's guardian if the guardian is not named as an abuser in the report, may receive, upon written request, a summary of the report of need except information that would identify the individual who made a report of suspected abuse or persons who cooperated in a subsequent investigation.(2) Upon request, the mandated reporter who filed the report of abuse may be informed whether a case had been opened as a result of the report.(c) Appeal.--A denial of services by the department or an area agency on aging under this chapter may be appealed in accordance with the rules and regulations issued by the department under Article XXII-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.Section 308-A. Substantiated perpetrators. If an investigation by an area agency on aging finds that an individual is a substantiated perpetrator, the individual may appeal the findings of the investigation and shall be entitled to the following:(1) Notification by the area agency on aging at the 20250HB1611PN1925 - 38 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 conclusion of the investigation that the individual has been determined to be a substantiated perpetrator and a brief summary of the investigative findings.(2) The right to file an appeal with the department under 1 Pa. Code Pt. II (relating to general rules of administrative practice and procedure) to challenge the determination.(3) The right to request additional information related to the determination, upon the filing of an appeal. Upon request, the area agency on aging shall provide, consistent with the confidentiality requirements of this act, a brief summary of the information that supports the determination.Section 309-A. Electronic records. A requirement of this act that information be prepared, filed, submitted, requested, maintained or signed in writing may be satisfied by the use of an electronic record or signature to the extent permitted by law, unless the department, an area agency on aging or a law enforcement agency requires the use of a non-electronic record or original signature.Section 310-A. Confidentiality standards required. An area agency on aging shall utilize the department's confidentiality standards established under section 204-A.Section 311-A. Availability of protective services. An area agency on aging shall offer protective services to an individual determined by the area agency on aging to be an older adult in need of protective services under this act.CHAPTER 4-APROTECTIVE SERVICESSection 401-A. Consent by request. An older adult shall receive protective services voluntarily 20250HB1611PN1925 - 39 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 unless the services are ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction.Section 402-A. Interference with services. If a person interferes with the provision of services or interferes with the rights of an older adult to consent to the provision of services, an area agency on aging may petition the court for an order enjoining the interference.Section 403-A. Financial obligations, liabilities and payments. An older adult receiving protective services and an agency providing services under this chapter shall comply with the following provisions regarding liability for the payment of services:(1) Funding to provide protective services under this chapter may not be used in place of any public or private entitlement or benefit for which the older adult receiving protective services under this chapter is or may be eligible.(2) Funding to provide protective services may not be used until eligibility and receipt of benefits under public and private entitlements or resources have been exhausted.(3) Funding available to local area agencies on aging under this chapter may be used to cover the costs of activities, including:(i) Administering protective services plans. (ii) Receiving and maintaining records of reports of abuse.(iii) Conducting investigations of reported abuse. (iv) Carrying out assessments and developing service plans.(v) Petitioning the court. (vi) Providing for emergency involuntary 20250HB1611PN1925 - 40 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 intervention.(vii) Arranging for available services needed to carry out service plans, including, as appropriate, arranging for services for other individuals in the household unit in order to reduce, correct or eliminate abuse of an older adult.(viii) Purchasing, on a temporary basis, services determined by a service plan to be necessary to reduce, correct or eliminate abuse of an older adult if the services are not available within the existing resources of the area agency on aging or other appropriate provider. Purchase of services under this section is limited to a 30-day period, which may be renewed with adequate justification under regulations promulgated by the department.(4) An older adult receiving protective services may not be charged a fee when the receipt of the services is not subject to cost sharing.Section 404-A. Involuntary intervention by emergency court order.(a) Emergency petition.-- (1) An area agency on aging may petition a court of common pleas for an emergency order to provide protective services to an older adult who is at imminent risk of death, serious injury or serious bodily injury; or rape, involuntary deviate sexual intercourse, sexual assault, institutional sexual assault, statutory sexual assault, aggravated indecent assault, indecent assault or incest, as defined by 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses).(2) The court of common pleas shall grant the petition 20250HB1611PN1925 - 41 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 if the court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that failure to provide protective services will place the older adult at imminent risk of death, serious injury or serious bodily injury; or rape, involuntary deviate sexual intercourse, sexual assault, institutional sexual assault, statutory sexual assault, aggravated indecent assault, indecent assault or incest, as defined by 18 Pa.C.S.(3) A court of common pleas shall ensure that a judge or magisterial district judge is available at all times to accept and rule on petitions for emergency court orders under this section if the area agency on aging determines that a delay until normal court hours may significantly increase danger to the older adult.(b) Limited order.--The court, after finding clear and convincing evidence of the need for an emergency order, shall order only services necessary to remove the conditions creating the established need.(c) Right to counsel.--In order to protect the rights of the older adult for whom protective services are being ordered, an emergency court order under this section shall provide that the older adult has the right to legal counsel. If the older adult is unable to provide for counsel, counsel shall be appointed by the court.(d) Forcible entry.--A law enforcement official may forcibly enter a premises if:(1) necessary to forcibly enter the premises after obtaining a court order; and(2) the law enforcement official is accompanied by a representative of the area agency on aging.(e) Health and safety requirements.-- 20250HB1611PN1925 - 42 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) The area agency on aging shall take reasonable steps to ensure that while the older adult is receiving services under an emergency court order:(i) the health and safety needs of the older adult's dependents are met; and(ii) the personal property and dwelling of the older adult are secure.(2) If a dependent of the older adult has health and safety needs, the area agency on aging shall make a report as follows:(i) A report of suspected child abuse shall be made in accordance with 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to child protective services).(ii) A report of need for adult protective services shall be made in accordance with the act of October 7, 2010 (P.L.484, No.70), known as the Adult Protective Services Act.Section 405-A. Confidentiality of records. (a) Requirement.-- (1) Information contained in a report, record of investigation, assessment and service plan created under this chapter shall be considered privileged and confidential and shall be maintained in accordance with regulations promulgated by the department.(2) The department or the area agency on aging may not release confidential information related to the older adult except by court order or to a law enforcement official or coroner under subsection (b)(2), and the confidential information may be used by the department in a civil proceeding, subject to a protective order.20250HB1611PN1925 - 43 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Information contained in a protective service record is subject to other Federal and State privacy and confidentiality laws.(b) Release of protective services records.-- (1) A protective services record may be provided to a court of competent jurisdiction or to another party pursuant to a court order.(2) A protective services record may be provided to a law enforcement official or coroner if the information is relevant to the official's or coroner's investigation of abuse or death of the older adult. The protective services record is not subject to inspection and duplication under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(3) In arranging specific services to carry out a service plan, the area agency on aging may disclose information to an appropriate service provider as may be necessary for the provision of services.(4) The older adult who is the subject of a report or, if the guardian is not named as an abuser in the report, the older adult's guardian, may receive, upon written request, a summary of the report of need except information that would identify the individual who made a report of suspected abuse or any person that cooperated in a subsequent investigation.(5) A mandatory reporter who makes a report of suspected abuse may receive, upon written request, confirmation from the area agency on aging that the report was received and the area agency on aging is acting in accordance with this chapter. No additional information beyond the confirmation shall be provided under this paragraph.20250HB1611PN1925 - 44 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) For purposes of monitoring area agency on aging performance or conducting other official duties, appropriate staff of the department, as designated by the secretary, may access protective services records.(7) The department or the area agency on aging may collaborate or share information included in protective services records with Commonwealth agencies for purposes of official Commonwealth business, to the extent permitted by law.(8) For purposes of coordination and continuity of service delivery, the department and the Department of Human Services shall each exchange protective services records, including assessments, service plans, reports of need and medical records of the following:(i) Older adults in need of protective services.(ii) Older adults in potential need of protective services.(iii) Adults in need of protective services as defined under the act of October 7, 2010 (P.L.484, No.70), known as the Adult Protective Services Act.(iv) Adults who are potentially in need of protective services under the Adult Protective Services Act.(9) The department or the area agency on aging may share a summary of protective services information with another area agency on aging performing a duty under this chapter relevant to older adults within the area agency on aging's jurisdiction.(10) An employee of an agency of another state who performs older adult protective services similar to those 20250HB1611PN1925 - 45 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under this chapter may access a summary of protective services information relevant to an older adult within the area agency on aging's jurisdiction.(11) A protective services record of an older adult may be provided to a health care provider that is examining or treating the older adult and suspects the older adult is in need of protection under this chapter.(12) A protective services record of an older adult may be provided to the director, or an individual specifically designated in writing by the director, of a hospital or other medical institution where an older adult is being treated if the director or designee suspects that the recipient is in need of protection under this act.(13) Unless prohibited by Federal law, a protective services record relating to financial exploitation may be provided to a financial institution or fiduciary as necessary to exercise the authority to prohibit disbursement of funds and financial transactions provided under section 603-A.(c) Definition.--For purposes of this section, "court order" does not include a subpoena.Section 406-A. Older adult fatality review team and written report.(a) Convening of team.--(1) An older adult fatality review team shall be convened by an area agency on aging in accordance with a protocol developed by the area agency on aging, the department and the district attorney for a case in which an older adult dies as a direct result of suspected or substantiated abuse during an active protective services case.20250HB1611PN1925 - 46 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The team may convene after the area agency on aging makes a determination of a direct connection between an older adult's death and suspected or substantiated abuse, and shall convene no later than 30 days from the receipt of the oral report to the department of the suspected or substantiated abuse of an older adult.(3) The area agency on aging in the county where the abuse occurred and in any county where the older adult resided within the six months preceding the fatality shall convene an older adult fatality review team.(4) An area agency on aging may establish an independent older adult fatality review team or jointly with other area agencies on aging. If a joint area agency on aging older adult fatality review team is established, the multicounty team members shall execute an agreement between participating counties regarding team membership, staffing and operations.(5) A fatality review team shall be multidisciplinary and culturally diverse and include professionals and representatives from organizations that provide services or community resources for older adults in the community served by the fatality review team. A team shall consist of at least six individuals who are broadly representative of the county where the team is established and have expertise in prevention and treatment of abuse of older adults.(6) With consideration given to the circumstances of each case and availability of individuals to serve as members, the team may consist of the following individuals:(i) A staff person from the area agency on aging. (ii) A member of the advisory committee or board of the area agency on aging.20250HB1611PN1925 - 47 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) A health care professional who is licensed to practice in this Commonwealth.(iv) A representative of the Pennsylvania Council on Aging.(v) A representative of law enforcement or the district attorney.(vi) An attorney-at-law trained in legal representation of older adults who is licensed to practice in this Commonwealth.(vii) A mental health professional who is licensed to practice in this Commonwealth.(viii) A representative of an entity specializing in older adult advocacy that provides services to older adults in the county. The individual under this subparagraph must not be an employee of the area agency on aging.(ix) The county coroner, medical examiner or forensic pathologist who is licensed to practice in this Commonwealth.(x) A representative of a local domestic violence program.(xi) A representative of a local drug and alcohol program.(xii) An individual representing caregivers. (xiii) Any individual who the area agency on aging or older adult fatality review team determines is necessary to assist the team in performing its duties.(7) Members of the team shall be responsible for all of the following:(i) Maintaining confidentiality of information under 20250HB1611PN1925 - 48 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 section 405-A.(ii) Providing and discussing relevant case-specific information.(iii) Attending and participating in all meetings and activities as required.(iv) Assisting in the development of the report under paragraph (4)(v).(8) The area agency on aging, in accordance with the protocol and in consultation with the team, shall appoint an individual who is not an employee of the area agency on aging to serve as chairperson of the team.(9) The team shall perform the following duties: (i) Review the circumstances of the older adult's fatality resulting from suspected or substantiated abuse. (ii) Review the delivery of services provided to the abused older adult by the area agency on aging and review any services provided by an area agency on aging in each county where the older adult resided or received services within the six months preceding the fatality. This subparagraph includes law enforcement, mental health services, programs for older adults and older adults with special needs, drug and alcohol programs, senior centers and health care providers.(iii) Review relevant court records and documents related to the abused older adult.(iv) Review the area agency on aging's compliance with statutes and regulations and with relevant policies and procedures of the area agency on aging.(b) Submission of report.-- (1) Not later than 90 days after convening, submit a 20250HB1611PN1925 - 49 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 final written report on the older adult fatality to the department and designated county officials under subsection (e).(2) Not later than 30 days after submission of the report to the department, the area agency on aging shall make the report available, upon request, to other individuals to whom confidential reports may be released, as specified by subsection (e).(3) The area agency on aging shall make available to the public a summary of the report, but shall remove identifying information from the contents of the report.(4) The area agency on aging may not release the report under paragraph (3) to the public if the district attorney certifies that release of the report may compromise a pending criminal investigation or proceeding. Certification by the district attorney shall stay the release of the report for a period of 60 days, at which time the report shall be released unless a new certification is made by the district attorney.(5) The report under this subsection shall include:(i) Any deficiency and strength in: (A) compliance with statutes and regulations; and(B) protective services to older adults. (ii) Any recommendation to improve protective services systems and community resources to reduce older adult abuse and related fatalities in the fatality review team's jurisdiction.(iii) Any proposed solution for inadequacies in the protective services systems.(iv) Any recommendation to improve sources of 20250HB1611PN1925 - 50 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information regarding the reporting and investigations of reported older adult abuse cases including standards for the uniform and consistent reporting and investigations by law enforcement or other emergency service responders within the fatality review team's jurisdiction.(v) Any recommendation for improvements to State laws and local partnerships, policies and practices to prevent older adult abuse and related deaths.(c) Response by department.-- (1) Not later than 45 days after receipt of a report of an older adult fatality under subsection (a), the department shall review the findings and recommendations of the report and provide a written response to the area agency on aging and the older adult fatality review team.(2) The department shall make the response, upon request, available to other individuals to whom confidential reports may be released, as specified by subsection (e).(3) A summary of the response shall be made available to the public, but the department shall remove identifying information from the contents of the response. The department may not release the response to the public if the district attorney certifies that release of the response may compromise a pending criminal investigation or proceeding. Certification by the district attorney shall stay the release of the report for a period of 60 days, at which time the report shall be released, unless a new certification is made by the district attorney.(d) Construction.-- (1) This section shall be construed to assist in the improvement of protective services designed to identify and 20250HB1611PN1925 - 51 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 prevent older adult abuse.(2) This section shall not be construed to impede or interfere with criminal prosecutions of persons who have committed older adult abuse.(e) Release of information in confidential reports.--(1) A report specified in this section shall only be made available to:(i) An authorized official of a county, of a Federal agency that has a need for the information to carry out its duties under law to protect older adults, from abuse or of an agency of another state that performs protective services analogous to the services performed by area agencies on aging or the department in the course of the official's duties, a multidisciplinary team member assigned to the case and any duly authorized person providing services under this act.(ii) An authorized official or agent of the department in accordance with department regulations or in accordance with the conduct of a performance monitoring under this act.(iii) A court of competent jurisdiction. (iv) A person pursuant to court order or subpoena. (v) A law enforcement agency or a law enforcement official of a jurisdiction, in the course of performing an official duty, as long as the information is relevant to performance of the duty.(vi) A standing committee of the General Assembly that specifically has department legislative oversight.(vii) A Federal auditor if required for Federal financial participation in funding of an agency, except 20250HB1611PN1925 - 52 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 that a Federal auditor may not remove an identifiable report or copy of the report from the department or area agency on aging.(viii) A designated county official, in reviewing the competence of the area agency on aging or its employees under this act. An official under this paragraph is limited to the following:(A) The board of commissioners of a county other than a county of the first class.(B) The board of directors of a nonprofit area agency on aging.(ix) An appropriate official of another county or state regarding an investigation related to older adult abuse when an older adult had moved to the other county or state. A report released under this subparagraph shall include a general protective service report and related information. The report and information shall be provided within seven calendar days. The department shall promulgate regulations as necessary to carry out the purposes of this subparagraph.(x) A member of an older adult fatality review team under this section.(xi) The Department of the Auditor General in conjunction with the performances of the duties designated to the Office of Auditor General, except that the Auditor General may not remove an identifiable report or copy of the report from the department or agency area agency on aging.(2) Upon a written request, the estate of the subject of a report may receive a copy of all information, except for 20250HB1611PN1925 - 53 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 information prohibited from disclosure under section 307-A.(3) Subject to section 506-A, a person under this section that has access to the information shall treat all reporting sources as confidential informants.(f) Duties of department.--The department, in consultation with State or local government agencies, shall have all of the following duties:(1) Provide necessary technical assistance to a fatality review team.(2) Promulgate regulations as necessary to implement this section.(3) Submit an annual report to the Governor and the General Assembly that includes a summary of reports received from each area agency on aging's fatality review teams and recommendations relating to the reduction of risk of older adult abuse and related deaths.(g) Authority to access records.--To the extent permitted by Federal law, a fatality review team may access records as follows:(1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and consistent with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, 110 Stat. 1936), the Department of Health shall provide the records of a deceased individual under review without the need for authorization of any person, including the executor, administrator or personal representative of the deceased individual for purposes of review under this section.(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and consistent with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, the team may review and inspect 20250HB1611PN1925 - 54 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mental health care service files and records of a deceased individual under review without the need for authorization of any person, including the executor, administrator or personal representative of the deceased individual for purposes of review under this section.(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and consistent with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, a health care facility and health care provider, pharmacy and mental health care provider shall provide medical records of a deceased individual under review without the need for authorization of any person, including the executor, administrator or personal representative of the deceased individual for purposes of review under this section.(4) If deemed necessary for its review, the team may petition the court for leave to review and inspect all files and records of the court relating to a deceased individual under review in accordance with 42 Pa.C.S. § 6307 (relating to inspection of court files and records).(5) Other records pertaining to the deceased under review for the purposes of this section shall be open to inspection and duplication as permitted by law.(h) Requests for records.--(1) The following shall be provided , to the extent permitted by Federal law, to a fatality review team on written request of the chairperson or designee of a fatality review team:(i) A record regarding the physical health and mental health, maintained by a health care provider, hospital or health system, for a deceased individual 20250HB1611PN1925 - 55 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under review by the fatality review team.(ii) A record maintained by a State or local government agency or entity, including death investigative information, medical examiner investigative information, law enforcement investigative information, emergency medical services report, fire department record, prosecutorial record, parole and probation information and record, court record and relevant information and record of a social services agency, including the Department of Human Services, if the agency or entity previously provided services to a deceased individual under review by the fatality review team.(iii) The following persons and entities shall comply with a records request by a fatality review team made under this subsection:(A) Coroner or medical examiner. (B) Fire department. (C) Health system. (D) Hospital. (E) Law enforcement agency. (F) State or local governmental agency, including the department, the Department of Health, Department of Human Services and the Department of Corrections.(G) Mental health provider. (H) Health care provider. (I) Substance use disorder treatment provider. (J) EMS provider. (K) Social services provider. (L) Any other person or entity in possession of 20250HB1611PN1925 - 56 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 a record pertinent to the fatality review team investigation of an older adult's death.(2) A person or entity subject to a records request by a fatality review team under subsection (a) may charge the fatality review team a reasonable fee for the service of duplicating any record requested by the fatality review team for which duplication is required.(3) If requested in writing by the chairperson or designee of the fatality review team, a person or entity shall provide information within five business days of receipt of the written request, excluding weekends and holidays, unless an extension is granted by the chairperson or designee. For purposes of this paragraph, a written request includes a request submitted via email or any other type of transmission.(4) A fatality review team shall not need an administrative subpoena or other form of legal compulsion to receive requested records under this section. This paragraph shall not be construed to impair any power or duty the fatality review team has to obtain an administrative subpoena or other form of legal compulsion.(5) Information received in response to a request under this section may be shared at a fatality review team meeting in accordance with this section.(6) A record may not be released during the pendency of an investigation if the release of the record would hinder the progress of an active investigation or criminal proceeding.(7) This subsection shall apply to the extent permitted by Federal law.20250HB1611PN1925 - 57 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) Confidentiality of fatality review team records and meetings.--(1) A fatality review team meeting shall be closed to the public and information discussed at the meeting shall be confidential.(2) The proceedings, records and information maintained by and shared with a fatality review team are not subject to:(i) Inspection and duplication under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(ii) Discovery, subpoena or introduction into evidence in a criminal or civil proceeding.(3) Information presented in or an opinion formed as a result of a meeting of a fatality review team may not be subject to subpoena or discovery or admissible in evidence in a civil or criminal action.(4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to prevent a member of a fatality review team from testifying in a criminal or civil proceeding to information obtained independently of participation in the fatality review team or to information which is publicly available.(j) Criminal and civil liability protections.(1) An individual who is not a member of a fatality review team may, in good faith, provide information to a fatality review team for the purposes of this section. A member of a fatality review team may discuss confidential matters during a meeting of the fatality review team. The following shall apply:(i) A member of a fatality review team shall comply with applicable Federal and State laws regarding 20250HB1611PN1925 - 58 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 confidentiality.(ii) Except as provided under paragraph (2), a member of a fatality review team or an individual who, in good faith, provides information to a fatality review team may not be disciplined, criminally prosecuted or held administratively or civilly liable for complying with this section.(2) The immunity specified under this subsection does not apply to a member of a fatality review team or an individual providing information to a fatality review team by invitation who:(i) rediscloses confidential information in a manner not in accordance with Federal or State law; or(ii) discloses confidential information to the fatality review team with malice, in bad faith or in a negligent manner.Section 6. Chapter 5 of the act is repealed:[CHAPTER 5CRIMINAL HISTORY FOR EMPLOYEESSection 501. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An individual who submits an application, which is being considered for employment, to a facility."State Police." The Pennsylvania State Police.Section 502. Information relating to prospective facility personnel.(a) General rule.--A facility shall require all applicants to submit with their applications, and shall require all 20250HB1611PN1925 - 59 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administrators and any operators who have or may have direct contact with a recipient to submit, the following information obtained within the preceding one-year period:(1) Pursuant to 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information), a report of criminal history record information from the State Police or a statement from the State Police that their central repository contains no such information relating to that person. The criminal history record information shall be limited to that which is disseminated pursuant to 18 Pa.C.S. § 9121(b)(2) (relating to general regulations).(2) Where the applicant is not and for the two years immediately preceding the date of application has not been a resident of this Commonwealth, administration shall require the applicant to submit with the application for employment a report of Federal criminal history record information pursuant to the Federal Bureau of Investigation's appropriation under the Departments of State, Justice, and Commerce, the Judiciary, and Related Agencies Appropriation Act, 1973 (Public Law 92-544, 86 Stat. 1109). The department shall be the intermediary for the purposes of this paragraph. For the purposes of this paragraph, the applicant shall submit a full set of fingerprints in a manner prescribed by the department. The Commonwealth shall submit the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. The information obtained from the criminal record check shall be used by the department to determine the applicant's eligibility. The determination shall be submitted to the administrator by the applicant prior to commencing employment. The administrator 20250HB1611PN1925 - 60 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall insure confidentiality of the information. The provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. § 9121(b)(2) shall not apply if the request for a report of Federal criminal history record information is made pursuant to this section.(b) (Reserved).Section 503. Grounds for denying employment.(a) General rule.--In no case shall a facility hire an applicant or retain an employee required to submit information pursuant to section 502(a) if the applicant's or employee's criminal history record information indicates the applicant or employee has been convicted of any of the following offenses:(1) An offense designated as a felony under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.(2) An offense under one or more of the following provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses):Chapter 25 (relating to criminal homicide).Section 2702 (relating to aggravated assault).Section 2901 (relating to kidnapping).Section 2902 (relating to unlawful restraint).Section 3121 (relating to rape).Section 3122.1 (relating to statutory sexual assault).Section 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse).Section 3124.1 (relating to sexual assault).Section 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent assault).Section 3126 (relating to indecent assault).Section 3127 (relating to indecent exposure).20250HB1611PN1925 - 61 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 3301 (relating to arson and related offenses).Section 3502 (relating to burglary).Section 3701 (relating to robbery).A felony offense under Chapter 39 (relating to theft and related offenses) or two or more misdemeanors under Chapter 39.Section 4101 (relating to forgery).Section 4114 (relating to securing execution of documents by deception).Section 4302 (relating to incest).Section 4303 (relating to concealing death of child).Section 4304 (relating to endangering welfare of children).Section 4305 (relating to dealing in infant children).Section 4952 (relating to intimidation of witnesses or victims).Section 4953 (relating to retaliation against witness or victim).A felony offense under section 5902(b) (relating to prostitution and related offenses).Section 5903(c) or (d) (relating to obscene and other sexual materials and performances).Section 6301 (relating to corruption of minors).Section 6312 (relating to sexual abuse of children).(3) A Federal or out-of-State offense similar in nature to those crimes listed in paragraphs (1) and (2).(c) Immunity.--An administrator or a facility shall not be held civilly liable for any action directly related to good 20250HB1611PN1925 - 62 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 faith compliance with this section.Section 504. Regulations.The department, in consultation with the Department of Health and the Department of Public Welfare, shall promulgate the regulations necessary to carry out this chapter.Section 505. Violations.(a) Administrative.--(1) An administrator who intentionally or willfully fails to comply or obstructs compliance with the provisions of this chapter commits a violation of this chapter and shall be subject to an administrative penalty under paragraph (3).(2) A facility owner that intentionally or willfully fails to comply with or obstructs compliance with this chapter commits a violation of this chapter and shall be subject to an administrative penalty under paragraph (3).(3) The Commonwealth agency or Commonwealth agencies which license the facility have jurisdiction to determine violations of this chapter and may issue an order assessing a civil penalty of not more than $2,500. An order under this paragraph is subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).(b) Criminal.--(1) An administrator who intentionally or willfully fails to comply or obstructs compliance with this chapter commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $2,500 or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.(2) A facility owner that intentionally or willfully 20250HB1611PN1925 - 63 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fails to comply with or obstructs compliance with this chapter commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $2,500 or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.Section 506. Provisional employees for limited periods.Notwithstanding section 502, administrators may employ applicants on a provisional basis for a single period not to exceed 30 days or, for applicants under section 502(a)(2), a period of 90 days, if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The applicant has applied for the information required under section 502 and the applicant provides a copy of the appropriate completed request forms to the administrator.(2) The administrator has no knowledge of information pertaining to the applicant which would disqualify him from employment pursuant to section 503, subject to 18 Pa.C.S. § 4911 (relating to tampering with public records or information).(3) The applicant swears or affirms in writing that he is not disqualified from employment under section 503.(4) If the information obtained under section 502 reveals that the applicant is disqualified from employment under section 503, the applicant shall be immediately dismissed by the administrator.(5) The department shall develop guidelines regarding the supervision of applicants. For a home health care agency, supervision shall include random direct supervision by an employee who has been employed by the facility for a period of one year.Section 507. State Police.20250HB1611PN1925 - 64 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 No later than one year following the effective date of this chapter, the State Police and the department shall report to the Aging and Youth Committee of the Senate and the Aging and Youth Committee of the House of Representatives with their findings and recommendations regarding the implementation of this chapter.Section 508. Applicability.This chapter shall apply as follows:(1) An individual who, on the effective date of this chapter, has continuously for a period of one year been an employee of the same facility shall be exempt from section 502 as a condition of continued employment.(2) If an employee is not exempt under paragraph (1), the employee and the facility shall comply with section 502 within one year of the effective date of this chapter.(3) If an employee who is exempt under paragraph (1) seeks employment with a different facility, the employee and the facility shall comply with section 502.(4) An employee who has obtained the information required under section 502 may transfer to another facility established and supervised by the same owner and is not required to obtain additional reports before making the transfer.]Section 7. The act is amended by adding chapters to read:CHAPTER 5-AREPORTINGSection 501-A. Voluntary reporting. A person who knows or has reasonable cause to believe that an older adult may be a victim of abuse may make an oral or electronic report to an area agency on aging.20250HB1611PN1925 - 65 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 502-A. Mandatory reporting. (a) Duty.--A mandatory reporter who knows or has reasonable cause to suspect that an older adult may be a victim of abuse shall:(1) Immediately make an oral or electronic report to the area agency on aging in accordance with the department's process and procedures.(2) Complete a written mandatory abuse report under section 504-A to the area agency on aging within 48 hours in accordance with the department's process and procedures.(b) Assistance.--A mandatory reporter employee may request assistance from the employee's administrator to complete a written mandatory abuse report.Section 503-A. Mandatory reporting to law enforcement officials and department.(a) Duty.--In addition to the reports to the area agency on aging under section 502-A, a mandatory reporter who knows or has reasonable cause to believe that an older adult may be a victim of suspicious death, serious bodily injury, serious injury; or rape, involuntary deviate sexual intercourse, sexual assault, institutional sexual assault, statutory sexual assault, aggravated indecent assault, indecent assault or incest as defined by 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses), shall:(1) Immediately contact law enforcement officials and the department to make an oral report.(2) Make a written mandatory abuse report to law enforcement officials within 48 hours.(b) Duty of area agency on aging.--The area agency on aging shall make a written mandatory abuse report under section 504-A to the department within 48 hours in accordance with the 20250HB1611PN1925 - 66 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department's process and procedures.Section 504-A. Contents of report. A written mandatory abuse report under this chapter shall be prepared in a manner and on forms prescribed by the department. At a minimum, the written mandatory abuse report shall include the following information, as well as additional information required by regulation:(1) Name, age, sex and address of the older adult. (2) Name and address of the older adult's legal representative or next of kin.(3) Name and address of the facility, if applicable. (4) Nature and location of the reported incident and any specific comment or observation directly related to the alleged incident and the older adult involved.(5) Any relevant information related to the identity of the alleged abuser, including, name, age, sex and relationship to the older adult.(6) Name of the individual making the written mandatory abuse report, contact information for the reporter and information regarding any action taken by the reporter in response to the incident, except as provided in section 506-A(b).Section 505-A. Coroner. If there is reasonable cause to suspect that an older adult died as a result of abuse, including a death within a coroner's jurisdiction under 16 Pa.C.S. Ch. 139 (relating to coroner), an area agency on aging shall give an oral or electronic report and forward a copy of the written mandatory abuse report as provided in section 504-A to the appropriate coroner within 24 hours. The coroner shall maintain the confidentiality of the written 20250HB1611PN1925 - 67 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 mandatory abuse report.Section 506-A. Protecting identity of reporter and cooperating witnesses.(a) Prohibition.--Except for disclosures to law enforcement officials and coroners, the release of records that would identify a person who made a report under this chapter or a person that cooperated in a subsequent investigation is prohibited and the records are exempt from inspection and duplication under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(b) Identity protection.--If a record is provided pursuant to a court order, the identity of the reporter and cooperating witnesses shall be deleted unless otherwise ordered by the court after an in camera review.CHAPTER 6-AFINANCIAL INSTITUTIONSSection 601-A. (Reserved). Section 602-A. Reporting suspected financial exploitation. (a) Report to designated representative.--If a financial institution employee has reason to believe that financial exploitation of an older adult may have occurred, may have been attempted or is being attempted, the financial institution employee shall, within the same business day, promptly report to a designated representative of the financial institution. (b) Review of report from financial institution employee and further reporting.--(1) No later than five business days after receipt of the report from the financial institution employee, the designated representative of the financial institution shall evaluate the report.20250HB1611PN1925 - 68 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) If, upon review, the designated representative of the financial institution concludes there is reasonable cause to believe financial exploitation may have occurred, has been attempted or is being attempted, the designated representative of the financial institution shall immediately report the information to an area agency on aging and a law enforcement agency, who shall follow reporting protocols specified by the department.(3) A report made to an agency under this subsection shall provide:(i) The name, age and address of the older adult.(ii) The name and address, if known, of the older adult's guardian, fiduciary or next of kin.(iii) The name and address of the financial institution and contact information for the individual submitting the report.(iv) The nature of the suspected financial exploitation of the older adult.(v) Any specific comment, observation or other information directly related to the alleged incident, the older adult and suspected perpetrator of the financial exploitation the financial institution determines is needed to facilitate investigation of the report.(vi) Whether a financial institution took an action authorized under section 603-A.(c) Construction.--Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a designated representative of the financial institution from voluntarily filing a report of need for an older adult potentially in need of protective services.Section 603-A. Holding transactions.20250HB1611PN1925 - 69 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) Authorization to financial institutions.--If a financial institution or a financial institution employee has reasonable cause to believe that financial exploitation of an older adult may have occurred, may have been attempted or is being attempted, the financial institution may take, subject to subsection (c), any of the following actions to temporarily hold a financial transaction pending an investigation:(1) Hold or temporarily refuse one or more financial transactions of the older adult.(2) Hold the withdrawal or disbursement of money contained in the older adult's account.(3) Hold a change in ownership of the older adult's account.(4) Hold a transfer of money from the older adult's account to an account owned wholly or partially by another person.(5) Hold complying with instructions given to the financial institution by a person who is authorized to have access to the older adult's account.(6) Hold the designation or change the designation of beneficiaries to receive any property, benefit, or contract rights for an older adult at death.(b) Duty to report.--If a financial institution takes action under subsection (a), the financial institution shall file a report under section 602-A no later than the next business day.(c) Conditions of holding a financial transaction.--Authority to hold a financial transaction under subsection (a) shall be as follows:(1) Subject to paragraphs (2) and (3), the financial transaction hold shall last for no longer than seven days 20250HB1611PN1925 - 70 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 after the date of the initial hold.(2) The authority granted to a financial institution under subsection (a) regarding holding financial transactions may be extended beyond seven days for an additional 15 business days at the request of an area agency on aging, a law enforcement agency or a legal representative of the older adult, or if the financial institution has not received a request to extend or terminate a hold from an area agency on aging, a law enforcement official or a legal representative of the older adult. A request by an area agency on aging, a law enforcement agency or a legal representative of an older adult to hold or authorize a financial transaction must be based on cause and be documented in writing.(3) A hold issued under subsection (a) may end sooner than the period described in paragraph (1) or (2) if any of the following applies:(i) The financial institution has reasonable cause to believe the financial transaction will not result in the financial exploitation of an older adult.(ii) The financial institution is instructed by a person who is authorized to have access to the older adult's account and is not suspected to be the perpetrator, an area agency on aging, law enforcement, or the department to cease its hold of a financial transaction or action taken under subsection (a).(iii) The financial institution is ordered by a court of competent jurisdiction to cease the hold.(d) Notification.--(1) Except as provided under Federal or State law, if a financial institution takes an action authorized under 20250HB1611PN1925 - 71 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection (a), the designated representative of the financial institution shall have the following duties: (i) Within one business day, notify the older adult and any person authorized to transact business on the account, except for a person reasonably believed to have engaged in suspected or attempted financial exploitation of the older adult.(ii) Within five business days, notify any person authorized by the older adult to receive notifications regarding account activity, except for a person reasonably believed to have engaged in suspected or attempted financial exploitation of the older adult.(2) The notification under paragraph (1) shall:(i) State the financial institution has temporarily blocked the disbursement of money or held the execution of a financial transaction as authorized by this section to protect the older adult from financial exploitation.(ii) Provide the name of the financial institution and the telephone number or other contact information of the financial institution for details about the action taken under this section.(iii) Identify the account or financial transaction to which the notification applies.(3) Notifications required by this subsection may be given:(i) in writing; (ii) in an electronic record in the manner authorized by section 304 of the act of December 16, 1999 (P.L.971, No.69), known as the Electronic Transactions Act; or20250HB1611PN1925 - 72 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (iii) orally, if a record of the oral communication is contemporaneously made and is retained by the financial institution.Section 604-A. Model training program. The department, in consultation with the Department of Banking and Securities and representatives of the financial services industry, shall develop a model training program for financial institution employees and designated representatives of financial institutions regarding the identification of activities that constitute financial exploitation of older adults.Section 605-A. Assistance by a person who is authorized to have access to the older adult's account.(a) Authorization.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law limiting or prohibiting disclosure, a designated representative of a financial institution may provide information relating to the account of an older adult to a person authorized to access the older adult's account sufficient to enable the person to:(1) consult with or assist the older adult in avoiding or remedying suspected financial exploitation; or(2) exercise the person's authority to protect the older adult.(b) Applicability.--Subsection (a) does not apply if the financial institution has reason to believe the person is knowingly engaged in or facilitating the financial exploitation of the older adult.(c) Disclosure of information.--Except when contacting an authorized contact provided by an older adult to a financial institution, a fiduciary authorized to manage some or all of the 20250HB1611PN1925 - 73 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 financial affairs of the older adult or a co-owner, additional authorized signatory or other person authorized to transact business on the account of the older adult, a designated representative of a financial institution:(1) May disclose only that there is reasonable cause to suspect that the older adult may be a victim or target of financial exploitation and the nature of the suspected financial exploitation.(2) May not disclose other details or confidential personal information regarding the financial affairs of the older adult.Section 606-A. Access to records.(a) Authorization.--Notwithstanding section 306-A, a financial institution that submitted a report to an area agency on aging under section 602-A regarding the financial exploitation or attempted financial exploitation of an older adult may:(1) Include in the report copies of records of financial transactions that are relevant to the suspected financial exploitation or attempted financial exploitation of the older adult.(2) Provide access to the records described under paragraph (1) to the area agency on aging to which the report is submitted.(b) Copies.--(1) A financial institution shall:(i) Upon written request of the area agency on aging or a law enforcement agency, provide, at no cost, access to or copies of records that are reasonably relevant to the suspected financial exploitation or attempted 20250HB1611PN1925 - 74 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 financial exploitation of the older adult to an area agency on aging, a law enforcement agency or the department, for the purpose of performing an investigation of the suspected financial exploitation or attempted financial exploitation.(ii) In response to a request for records under this section, provide access to or copies of records under this section within two business days. Records under this section may include records regarding the most recent financial transaction or other prior financial transactions that may constitute financial exploitation, not to exceed 60 calendar days prior to the first financial transaction that was reported or 60 calendar days after the last financial transaction that was reported, whichever is earlier.(2) Records under this section may also include, or may be subsequently supplemented by, records of the older adult that a financial institution believes, upon consultation with an area agency on aging, are needed to provide protective services to the older adult. (c) Confidentiality.-- (1) Information and records submitted by a financial institution to an area agency on aging, the department or a law enforcement agency shall be privileged and given confidential treatment and:(i) Shall not be subject to discovery or admissible as evidence in a private civil action.(ii) Shall not be subject to subpoena. (iii) Shall be exempt from access under the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-20250HB1611PN1925 - 75 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Know Law.(iv) Except as provided in paragraph (3), shall not be made public by the any person without the prior written consent of the financial institution.(2) An employee of an area agency on aging, the department, a law enforcement agency, or any other person who receives information under chapter while acting under the authority of the area agency on aging, the department, a law enforcement agency or a person with whom the information is shared under this chapter may not testify in a private civil action concerning confidential information in the transparency report.(3) To assist in the performance of duties, an area agency on aging, the department or a law enforcement agency may:(i) Use information submitted under this section in furtherance of a administrative or legal action brought under this act or the laws of this Commonwealth.(ii) Share information submitted under this section with other government agencies or law enforcement officials of this Commonwealth or other jurisdictions and third-party consultants if, prior to receiving the reports from a financial institution under this chapter, the recipient demonstrates by written statement the necessary authority and intent to give confidential treatment to the information as required by this section.(4) Sharing of information by a financial institution under this section with, to or by an area agency on aging, the department or a law enforcement agency as authorized by this chapter does not constitute a waiver of any applicable 20250HB1611PN1925 - 76 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 privilege or claim of confidentiality.(d) Disclosures regarding investigations.--Notwithstanding the requirements of section 306-A, an area agency on aging may disclose and discuss with a financial institution reports of the financial exploitation of an older adult and the results of the investigation of reports to the extent reasonably necessary to facilitate the financial institution's authority under section 602-A(b) to:(1) hold a financial transaction;(2) consult with a person authorized to have access to the older adult's account under section 602-A(c); or(3) produce records requested under section 603-A.Section 607-A. Annual Reporting on Financial Exploitation.No later than six months following the effective date of this subsection and by December 31 thereafter, a financial institution shall submit information to the department, which shall be included in the department's older adult protective services annual report. Information reported by a financial institution under this section shall include the following:(1) The number of reports made by the financial institution under section 603-A including:(i) The number of occasions in which the financial institution was contacted as part of an investigation of potential financial exploitation by an area agency on aging or law enforcement agency resulting from a report made by the financial institution.(ii) The average time in between the financial institution making a report under section 602-A and the first contact by an area agency on aging or law enforcement agency.20250HB1611PN1925 - 77 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (2) The total number, dollar value and types of financial transaction held by the financial institution under section 602-A(b) during the preceding 12 months. This shall include:(i) Each category of transaction.(ii) The number and dollar value of the transactions that were confirmed after investigation to represent financial exploitation or attempted financial exploitation.(iii) The number and dollar value of the transactions that were confirmed after investigation to not represent financial exploitation or attempted financial exploitation.(iv) The number and categories of transactions in which an extension was requested in accordance with section 603-A(c).(v) The number and value of transactions that were released in seven business days or less.Section 608-A. Estate planning by affidavit.A financial institution may rely on an affidavit executed by an attorney for an older adult, or certification or legal opinion by an attorney acting as an agent for an older adult as provided under 20 Pa.C.S. § 5608 (relating to acceptance of and reliance upon power of attorney), as conclusive proof that a transaction does not represent financial exploitation if the following apply:(1) The affidavit states that the transaction in question is for the purpose of establishing, implementing or continuing an estate plan intended to reduce taxes or to qualify the older adult or the spouse of the older adult for 20250HB1611PN1925 - 78 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 public or private benefits.(2) The attorney, as part of estate planning under this section, furnishes the affidavit to a designated representative of the financial institution relying upon the affidavit on demand.Section 609-A. Penalties. (a) Failure to report.--If a designated representative of a financial institution willfully or intentionally fails to file a report required under section 603-A, the financial institution shall be subject to a penalty levied by the department, which shall not be less than $500 nor exceed $2,500.(b) Additional penalties.--A designated representative of the financial institution or officer of a financial institution who willfully or intentionally aids in the financial exploitation of an older adult or commits retaliatory actions against a designated representative or other employee of the financial institution because of an attempt to comply with this chapter shall be subject to criminal and civil penalties under section 801-A, along with any other applicable provision of law.(c) Consultation.--The department shall consult and notify the primary regulator of a financial institution for:(1) An investigation of the financial institution for potential violations of this chapter, including notifying the financial institution's primary regulator that an investigation into a potential penalty under this chapter has been initiated.(2) Penalties under this section assessed against a financial institution utilizing a matrix developed by the department in consultation with the Department of Banking and Securities.20250HB1611PN1925 - 79 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 610-A. Immunity. A person acting in good faith, according to this chapter, shall have immunity from liability for providing access to records or holding a transaction in accordance with this chapter.Section 611-A. Financial institution compliance policies.A financial institution shall create and implement internal compliance policies, plans and procedures to comply with this act.Section 8. Chapter 7 of the act is repealed:[CHAPTER 7REPORTING SUSPECTED ABUSE BY EMPLOYEESSection 701. Reporting by employees.(a) Mandatory reporting to agency.--(1) An employee or an administrator who has reasonable cause to suspect that a recipient is a victim of abuse shall immediately make an oral report to the agency. If applicable, the agency shall advise the employee or administrator of additional reporting requirements that may pertain under subsection (b). An employee shall notify the administrator immediately following the report to the agency.(2) Within 48 hours of making the oral report, the employee or administrator shall make a written report to the agency. The agency shall notify the administrator that a report of abuse has been made with the agency.(3) The employee may request the administrator to make or to assist the employee to make the oral and written reports required by this subsection.(b) Mandatory reports to law enforcement officials.--(1) An employee or an administrator who has reasonable 20250HB1611PN1925 - 80 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 cause to suspect that a recipient is the victim of sexual abuse, serious physical injury or serious bodily injury or that a death is suspicious shall, in addition to contacting the agency and the department, immediately contact law enforcement officials to make an oral report. An employee shall notify the administrator immediately following the report to law enforcement officials.(2) Within 48 hours of making the oral report, the employee and an administrator shall make a written report to appropriate law enforcement officials.(3) The law enforcement officials shall notify the administrator that a report has been made with the law enforcement officials.(4) The employee may request the administrator to make or to assist the employee to make the oral and written reports to law enforcement required by this subsection.(c) Contents of report.--A written report under this section shall be in a manner and on forms prescribed by the department. The report shall include, at a minimum, the following information:(1) Name, age and address of the recipient.(2) Name and address of the recipient's guardian or next of kin.(3) Name and address of the facility.(4) Nature of the alleged offense.(5) Any specific comments or observations that are directly related to the alleged incident and the individual involved.Section 702. Reports to department and coroner.(a) Department.--20250HB1611PN1925 - 81 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) Within 48 hours of receipt of a written report under section 701(a) involving sexual abuse, serious physical injury, serious bodily injury or suspicious death, the agency shall transmit a written report to the department. Supplemental reports shall be transmitted as they are obtained by the agency.(2) A report under this subsection shall be made in a manner and on forms prescribed by the department. The report shall include, at a minimum, the following information:(i) The name and address of the alleged victim.(ii) Where the suspected abuse occurred.(iii) The age and sex of the alleged perpetrator and victim.(iv) The nature and extent of the suspected abuse, including any evidence of prior abuse.(v) The name and relationship of the individual responsible for causing the alleged abuse to the victim, if known, and any evidence of prior abuse by that individual.(vi) The source of the report.(vii) The individual making the report and where that individual can be reached.(viii) The actions taken by the reporting source, including taking of photographs and x-rays, removal of recipient and notification under subsection (b).(ix) Any other information which the department may require by regulation.(b) Coroner.--For a report under section 701(a) which concerns the death of a recipient, if there is reasonable cause to suspect that the recipient died as a result of abuse, the 20250HB1611PN1925 - 82 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 agency shall give the oral report and forward a copy of the written report to the appropriate coroner within 24 hours.Section 703. Investigation.(a) Law enforcement officials.--Upon receipt of a report under section 701(b), law enforcement officials shall conduct an investigation to determine what criminal charges, if any, will be filed.(b) Notification.--If law enforcement officials have reasonable cause to suspect that a recipient has suffered sexual abuse, serious physical injury, serious bodily injury or a suspicious death, law enforcement officials shall notify the agency.(c) Cooperation.--To the fullest extent possible, law enforcement officials, the facility and the agency shall coordinate their respective investigations. Law enforcement officials, the facility and the agency shall advise each other and provide any applicable additional information on an ongoing basis.(d) Further notification.--Law enforcement officials shall notify the agency and the facility of a decision regarding criminal charges. The agency and the department shall keep a record of any decision regarding criminal charges.(e) Compliance with Chapter 3.--In addition to the provisions of this section, the agency shall comply with Chapter 3.Section 704. Restrictions on employees.(a) Plan of supervision.--Upon notification that an employee is alleged to have committed abuse, the facility shall immediately implement a plan of supervision or, where appropriate, suspension of the employee, subject to approval by 20250HB1611PN1925 - 83 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the agency and by the Commonwealth agency with regulatory authority over the facility. A plan of supervision for a home health care agency must include periodic random direct inspections of care-dependent individuals by a facility employee who has been continuously employed by that facility for a period of at least one year.(b) Prohibition.--Upon the filing of criminal charges against an employee, the Commonwealth agency which licenses the facility shall order the facility to immediately prohibit that employee from having access to recipients at the facility. If that employee is a director, operator, administrator or supervisor, that employee shall be subject to restrictions deemed appropriate by the Commonwealth agency which licenses the facility to assure the safety of recipients of the facility.Section 705. Confidentiality of and access to confidential reports.(a) General rule.--Except as provided in subsection (b), a report under this chapter shall be confidential.(b) Exceptions.--A report under this chapter shall be made available to all of the following:(1) An employee of the department or of an agency in the course of official duties in connection with responsibilities under this chapter.(2) An employee of the Department of Health or the Department of Public Welfare in the course of official duties.(3) An employee of an agency of another state which performs protective services similar to those under this chapter.(4) A practitioner of the healing arts who is examining 20250HB1611PN1925 - 84 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or treating a recipient and who suspects that the recipient is in need of protection under this chapter.(5) The director, or an individual specifically designated in writing by the director, of any hospital or other medical institution where a victim is being treated if the director or designee suspects that the recipient is in need of protection under this chapter.(6) A guardian of the recipient.(7) A court of competent jurisdiction pursuant to a court order.(8) The Attorney General.(9) Law enforcement officials of any jurisdiction as long as the information is relevant in the course of investigating cases of abuse.(10) A mandated reporter under Chapter 3 who made a report of suspected abuse. Information released under this paragraph shall be limited to the following:(i) The final status of the report following the investigation.(ii) Services provided or to be provided by the agency.(c) Excision of certain names.--The name of the person suspected of committing the abuse shall be excised from a report made available under subsection (b)(4), (5) and (10).(d) Release of information to alleged perpetrator and victim.--Upon written request, an alleged perpetrator and victim may receive a copy of all information except that prohibited from being disclosed by subsection (e).(e) Protecting identity of person making report.--Except for reports to law enforcement officials, the release of data that 20250HB1611PN1925 - 85 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 would identify the individual who made a report under this chapter or an individual who cooperated in a subsequent investigation is prohibited. Law enforcement officials shall treat all reporting sources as confidential information.Section 706. Penalties.(a) Administrative.--(1) An administrator who intentionally or willfully fails to comply or obstructs compliance with the provisions of this chapter or who intimidates or commits a retaliatory act against an employee who complies in good faith with the provisions of this chapter commits a violation of this chapter and shall be subject to an administrative penalty under paragraph (3).(2) A facility owner that intentionally or willfully fails to comply with or obstructs compliance with this chapter or that intimidates or commits a retaliatory act against an employee who complies in good faith with this chapter commits a violation of this chapter and shall be subject to an administrative penalty under paragraph (3).(3) The Commonwealth agency or Commonwealth agencies which regulate the facility have jurisdiction to determine violations of this chapter and may issue an order assessing a civil penalty of not more than $2,500. An order under this paragraph is subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and Ch. 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).(b) Criminal.--(1) An administrator who intentionally or willfully fails to comply or obstructs compliance with this chapter 20250HB1611PN1925 - 86 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $2,500 or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.(2) A facility owner that intentionally or willfully fails to comply with or obstructs compliance with this chapter commits a misdemeanor of the third degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of $2,500 or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.(c) Penalties for failure to report.--A person required under this chapter to report a case of suspected abuse who willfully fails to do so commits a summary offense for the first violation and a misdemeanor of the third degree for a second or subsequent violation.Section 707. Immunity.An administrator or a facility shall not be held civilly liable for any action directly related to good faith compliance with this chapter.Section 708. Regulations.The Department of Aging, the Department of Health and the Department of Public Welfare shall promulgate the regulations necessary to carry out this chapter.]Section 9. The act is amended by adding chapters to read:CHAPTER 7-ACRIMINAL HISTORYSection 701-A. Criminal history. (a) Submission.-- (1) A person listed in subsection (c) shall submit a full set of fingerprints in a manner prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police.(2) The Pennsylvania State Police shall check the 20250HB1611PN1925 - 87 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fingerprints against the Pennsylvania State Police central repository for the purpose of a State criminal history record check. Under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 91 (relating to criminal history record information), a report of criminal history record information, obtained within the preceding one-year period from the Pennsylvania State Police, or a statement from the Pennsylvania State Police that the central repository contains no information relating to that person shall be submitted to the department. The criminal history record information shall be limited to information which is disseminated under 18 Pa.C.S. § 9121(b)(2) (relating to general regulations).(3) The Pennsylvania State Police shall submit a full set of fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for a national criminal history record check. The Pennsylvania State Police will provide the department with the national criminal history record information of the individual. The information under this subsection shall not be limited by 18 Pa.C.S. § 9121(b). The Department shall be guided by federal law, state law, and Criminal Justice Information Services policy.(b) Determination.--The information obtained from the criminal history record checks under subsection (a) shall be used by the department to determine eligibility under section 702-A. The determination shall be submitted to the individual and the administrator by the department prior to employment commencing except as specified in section 703-A.(c) Scope.--The following individuals shall submit to the criminal history information inquiry required under subsection (a):20250HB1611PN1925 - 88 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) An applicant. (2) A prospective administrator who has or may have direct contact with a recipient.(3) A prospective operator who has or may have direct contact with a recipient.(d) Written notice of new arrest or conviction.-- (1) If an employee is arrested for or convicted of an offense that would constitute grounds for denying employment under section 702-A, the employee shall provide written notice of the arrest or conviction to the administrator or designee not later than 72 hours after the arrest or conviction.(2) If the person responsible for employment decisions or the administrator has a reasonable belief that an employee was convicted of an offense that would constitute grounds for denying employment under section 702-A, or the employee has provided notice as required under paragraph (1), the person or the administrator shall immediately require the employee to submit current information as required under subsection (a).Section 702-A. Grounds for denying employment. (a) Prohibited offenses.--The following offenses, and Federal or out-of-State offenses similar in nature, shall be prohibited as follows:(1) Subject to subsection (b), a facility may not hire an applicant or retain an employee for a period of 35 years from the individual's release or discharge from a Federal, State or county correctional institution or from termination of supervised probation or parole, whichever is later, if the department determines that the applicant's or employee's 20250HB1611PN1925 - 89 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 criminal history record information indicates that the applicant or employee has been convicted of an offense or attempt, solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under one of the following provisions of 18 Pa.C.S. (relating to crimes and offenses):(i) Chapter 25 (relating to criminal homicide). (ii) Section 2718 (relating to strangulation). (iii) Section 3011 (relating to trafficking in individuals).(iv) Section 3121 (relating to rape).(v) Section 3123 (relating to involuntary deviate sexual intercourse).(vi) Section 3124.2 (relating to institutional sexual assault).(2) Subject to subsection (b), a facility may not hire an applicant or retain an employee for a period of 20 years after the individual's release or discharge from a Federal, State or county correctional institution or from termination of supervised probation or parole, whichever is later, if the department determines that the applicant's or employee's criminal history record information indicates the applicant or employee has been convicted of an offense or attempt, solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under one of the following provisions of 18 Pa.C.S.:(i) Chapter 26 (relating to crimes against unborn child).(ii) Section 2702 (relating to aggravated assault). (iii) Section 2713 (relating to neglect of care- dependent person).(iv) Section 2715 (relating to threat to use weapons 20250HB1611PN1925 - 90 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of mass destruction).(v) Section 2716 (relating to weapons of mass destruction).(vi) Section 2717 (relating to terrorism). (vii) Section 2901 (relating to kidnapping). (viii) Section 2903 (relating to false imprisonment).(ix) Section 3122.1 (relating to statutory sexual assault).(x) Section 3124.1 (relating to sexual assault). (xi) Section 3125 (relating to aggravated indecent assault).(xii) Section 3126 (relating to indecent assault). (xiii) Section 3129 (relating to sexual intercourse with animal).(xiv) Section 3212 (relating to infanticide). (xv) Section 4302 (relating to incest). (xvi) Section 4303 (relating to concealing death of child).(xvii) A felony offense under section 4304 (relating to endangering welfare of children).(xviii) Section 4305 (relating to dealing in infant children).(xix) Section 5510 (relating to abuse of corpse). (xx) Section 5903(a)(1), (3)(ii), (5)(ii) or (6), (c) or (d) (relating to obscene and other sexual materials and performances).(xxi) Section 6312 (relating to sexual abuse of children).(xxii) Section 6318 (relating to unlawful contact 20250HB1611PN1925 - 91 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with a minor).(xxiii) Section 6319 (relating to solicitation of minors to traffic drugs).(xxiv) Section 6320 (relating to the sexual exploitation of children).(3) Subject to subsection (b), a facility may not hire an applicant or retain an employee for a period of 10 years from the individual's release or discharge from a Federal, State or county correctional institution or from termination of supervised probation or parole, whichever is later, if the department determines that the applicant's or employee's criminal history record information indicates that the applicant or employee has been convicted of an offense or attempt, solicitation or conspiracy to commit an offense under one of the following provisions of 18 Pa.C.S.:(i) Section 2710 (relating to ethnic intimidation). (ii) Section 2902 (relating to unlawful restraint). (iii) A felony offense under section 2904 (relating to interference with custody of children).(iv) Section 2909 (relating to concealment of whereabouts of a child).(v) Section 3127 (relating to indecent exposure). (vi) Section 3131 (relating to unlawful dissemination of intimate image).(vii) Section 3301 (relating to arson and related offenses).(viii) Section 3502 (relating to burglary). (ix) Section 3701 (relating to robbery). (x) Section 3702 (relating to robbery of motor vehicle).20250HB1611PN1925 - 92 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (xi) A felony offense under Chapter 39 (relating to theft and related offenses).(xii) Section 4101 (relating to forgery). (xiii) Section 4103 (relating to fraudulent destruction, removal or concealment of recordable instruments).(xiv) Section 4106 (relating to access device fraud).(xv) Section 4114 (relating to securing execution of documents by deception).(xvi) Section 4115 (relating to falsely impersonating persons privately employed).(xvii) Section 4120 (relating to identity theft). (xviii) A misdemeanor of the first degree under section 4304.(xix) Section 4952 (relating to intimidation of witnesses or victims).(xx) Section 4953 (relating to retaliation against witness, victim or party).(xxi) A felony offense under section 5902(b) (relating to prostitution and related offenses).(xxii) Section 5902(b.1). (xxiii) Section 5903(c) or (d). (xxiv) Section 6301 (relating to corruption of minors).(xxv) Two or more misdemeanors under Chapter 39. (4) Subject to subsection (b), a facility may not hire an applicant or retain an employee for a period of five years from the individual's release or discharge from a Federal, State or county correctional institution or from termination 20250HB1611PN1925 - 93 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of supervised probation or parole, whichever is later, if the department determines that the applicant's or employee's criminal history record information indicates that the applicant or employee has been convicted of an offense under one of the following provisions of 18 Pa.C.S.:(i) Any of the following provisions of 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles):(A) Section 3735 (relating to homicide by vehicle while driving under influence).(B) Section 3735.1 (relating to aggravated assault by vehicle while driving under the influence).(C) Section 3742 (relating to accidents involving death or personal injury).(D) Section 3802 (relating to driving under influence of alcohol or controlled substance) graded as a misdemeanor of the second degree or higher.(ii) An offense designated as a felony under the act of April 14, 1972 (P.L.233, No.64), known as The Controlled Substance, Drug, Device and Cosmetic Act.(iii) A misdemeanor of the first degree or a felony under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4105 (relating to bad checks).(iv) Two or more misdemeanors under 18 Pa.C.S. Ch. 39 (relating to theft and related offenses).(v) Two or more misdemeanors under 18 Pa.C.S. § 2705 (relating to recklessly endangering another person).(vi) Convictions listed under subparagraph (i) shall be prohibited if the position the applicant is applying for or the employee is performing includes driving or transporting older adults.20250HB1611PN1925 - 94 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (5) Modifications to prohibited offenses.(i) The secretary may periodically review and, by regulation, modify the lists of prohibited offenses under subsection (a). The secretary may add additional offenses to the lists of prohibited offenses in subsections (a)(1), (a)(2), (a)(3) and (a)(4). The secretary may remove offenses enumerated in the list of prohibited offenses in subsections (a)(3) and (a)(4). In making a decision to promulgate a regulation modifying the list of prohibited offenses, the secretary shall consider whether:(A) The modification poses a significant and unacceptable level of risk to older adults.(B) The modification does not impede safe and efficient job performance.(C) The prohibition is related to the job positions subject to the relevant employment bans under this subsection.(D) The underlying conduct related to the offense makes an individual unfit for a job position subject to the prohibitions on hiring and retention under this subsection.(E) The prohibition is consistent with the business necessity of ensuring protections for older adults.(F) The underlying conduct related to the offense is relevant to a job position subject to the prohibitions on hiring and retention under this subsection.(G) The underlying conduct related to the offense is relevant to the purpose of employment.20250HB1611PN1925 - 95 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) After considering the factors in this paragraph, the secretary shall make findings and issue a regulation modifying the list if the secretary finds the modification is consistent with maintaining a qualified workforce that promotes and ensures the safety of older adults.(b) Waiver request.-- (1) Unless prohibited by Federal law, the department may grant a waiver of the prohibitions on hiring and retention under subsection (a) in accordance with this subsection after submission of a written waiver request by an applicant, employee or employer.(2) The waiver request must be submitted on a form provided by the department and contain the following:(i) The length of time since the applicant's or employee's conviction.(ii) The nature and circumstances of the applicant's or employee's conviction.(iii) If the applicant or employee was incarcerated, a copy of the order from the Federal, State or local jurisdiction that released the individual from incarceration, including the date of release.(iv) Evidence of the applicant's or employee's rehabilitation.(v) The nature of and requirements of the job. (vi) The relationship of the offense to the applicant's or employee's current or prospective job position.(vii) A copy of any previously approved waiver request.20250HB1611PN1925 - 96 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (viii) If available and applicable, a letter from the individual's probation or parole officer.(ix) The facility type for which the applicant is seeking or retaining employment or the facility type that has an interest in potentially hiring or retaining the applicant.(x) A letter from the current or prospective employer indicating, if applicable, an interest in potentially hiring or retaining the applicant or employee if a waiver request is granted.(xi) The applicant's age relevant to the applicant's potential longevity for future employment.(3) The department may review and consider additional relevant information or factors in making its determination.(c) Waiver approval.--The department shall review and issue a decision on approval or denial of the waiver request not later than 30 days after receipt of the written waiver request. The department shall specify each offense waived by the department and each offense that has been denied a waiver request with the department's decision.(d) Applicability.-- (1) A waiver request granted under this section applies only to the offense and facility type listed on the waiver application.(2) If granted, the waiver shall remain in place indefinitely and be transferrable to the same or similar position with an employer of an applicable facility type.(3) The waiver shall not apply if the applicant or employee attempts to secure new employment for a substantially different position.20250HB1611PN1925 - 97 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (e) Limitations.-- (1) The grant of a waiver request by the department does not guarantee hiring or retention of employment to the applicant or employee.(2) In addition to the notice requirements of Section 701-A(d), if any new criminal charges are filed against an applicant or employee who has obtained a waiver from the department, the applicant or employee must report the new criminal charges to both the employer and the department not later than seven days after the charges were filed.(3) If the new conviction is prohibited under this act, the applicant or employee must submit a new waiver request.(4) If a waiver request is denied, an individual may resubmit a new waiver request once every five years.(f) Appeal rights.-- (1) If the department denies a request for a waiver under this section, the person whose request was denied shall have 20 days to submit a written appeal to the secretary.(2) Upon receipt of a notice of appeal, the secretary shall have 30 days to complete a review of the relevant facts and circumstances and issue a final decision.(3) If the secretary fails to issue a final decision within the 30 days, the appeal shall be deemed denied.(4) All final decisions by the secretary shall be reviewable in accordance with the laws of this Commonwealth.(g) Duties and responsibilities of department.-- (1) Not later than 60 days after the effective date of this paragraph, the department shall develop a waiver request form.(2) Not later than 90 days after the effective date of 20250HB1611PN1925 - 98 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 this paragraph, the department shall develop a procedure for hearing appeals resulting from department denials of waiver request applications.(h) Date of release or discharge.--To determine an individual's release, discharge or termination of supervision, the individual must provide to the department, upon request, documentation relating to the individual's release or discharge from a Federal, State or county correctional institution or from termination of supervised probation or parole.(i) Penalties.--An individual who willfully fails to disclose a conviction for an offense enumerated under subsection (a) shall be subject to termination and may be subject to criminal prosecution under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).(j) Construction.--This section may not be construed to require a current employee of a facility to obtain a waiver pertaining to the employee's current employment or for an application at the same facility for a substantially similar position as the employee's current position.Section 703-A. Provisional employees for limited periods. (1) A facility may employ an applicant on a provisional basis for a single period not to exceed 60 days, if all of the following conditions are met:(i) The applicant has applied and submitted fingerprints for a criminal history record information report required under section 701-A(a)(1) and (2) and provided the facility with a copy of the completed request forms.(ii) The facility has no knowledge about the applicant that would disqualify the applicant from 20250HB1611PN1925 - 99 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employment under 18 Pa.C.S. § 4911 (relating to tampering with public records or information).(iii) The applicant swears or affirms in writing that the applicant is not disqualified from employment under this act.(2) If the information obtained from the criminal history record information report required under section 701-A reveals that the applicant is disqualified from employment, the applicant shall be dismissed immediately.(3) If an individual has been employed at a facility on a provisional basis in accordance with paragraphs (1) and (2), but the department has not completed its determination prior to the expiration of 60 days under this section, the individual may remain employed on a provisional basis until the department has made a determination or for 30 days, whichever is earlier.(4) The department shall develop guidelines, in consultation with the Department of Health and the Department of Human Services, regarding the supervision of applicants. Supervision shall include direct supervision by an employee who has been employed by the facility for a period of at least one year.Section 704-A. Compliance. (a) Immunity.--A facility may not be held civilly or criminally liable or subject to administrative penalties for hiring decisions under this chapter in which the facility complies or makes a good faith effort in any of the following circumstances to comply with the requirements of this chapter, including any subsequent rule or regulation issued by the department to effectuate the hiring or retention of an 20250HB1611PN1925 - 100 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 applicant, relating to:(1) Hiring or retention of an applicant through the use of a waiver in accordance with section 702-A or regulations promulgated by the department to effectuate section 702-A.(2) A decision by a facility to not hire or retain an applicant or employee even if the applicant or employee receives a waiver.(b) Limitation.-- (1) Immunity from civil, criminal or administrative penalties under this section may not be construed as applying beyond the decision to hire or not hire an applicant or retain or not retain an employee under this chapter and does not extend to the conduct of an applicant while employed by a facility.(2) This section may not be construed to be or used as a defense for a facility failing to meet the obligations required under this act pertaining to management and oversight of individuals applying for employment or employed by the facility.CHAPTER 8-AREMEDIESSection 801-A. Penalties. (a) Administrative and civil penalties.-- (1) A mandatory reporter who fails to comply or obstructs compliance with the provisions of this act or who intimidates or commits a retaliatory act against an individual who complies in good faith with this act commits a violation of this act and shall be subject to an administrative penalty.(2) The department shall have jurisdiction to determine 20250HB1611PN1925 - 101 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 violations of this act and may issue an order assessing a civil penalty of not more than $5,000. An order under this paragraph is subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).(3) A Commonwealth agency that licenses a facility shall have jurisdiction regarding violations of section 701-A and may issue an order assessing a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000.(4) An older adult or a person making a report or cooperating with the area agency on aging, including providing testimony in an administrative or judicial proceeding, shall be free from discriminatory, retaliatory or disciplinary action by an employer or any other person or facility. A person who violates this paragraph shall be subject to a civil action by the reporter or the older adult. The older adult or person making a report or cooperating with the area agency on aging may recover treble compensatory damages, compensatory and punitive damages or $5,000, whichever is greater.(5) A person, including the older adult, with knowledge sufficient to justify making a report or cooperating with the area agency on aging, including providing testimony in an administrative or judicial proceeding, shall be free from intimidation by an employer or any other person. A person who violates this paragraph shall be subject to a civil action by the individual intimidated or the older adult. The person intimidated or the older adult may recover treble compensatory damages, compensatory and punitive damages or 20250HB1611PN1925 - 102 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 $5,000, whichever is greater.(b) Criminal penalties.-- (1) A mandatory reporter who intentionally fails to report suspected abuse of an older adult commits a summary offense for the first violation and a misdemeanor of the second degree for a second or subsequent violation and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $5,000 or to imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.(2) A person who intentionally makes a false statement or representation of a material fact in a report of need commits a misdemeanor of the first degree and shall, upon conviction, be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $10,000 or to imprisonment for not more than five years, or both.Section 802-A. Immunity from civil and criminal liability. (1) A person who makes a report of need or who provides testimony in an administrative or judicial proceeding in a court of this Commonwealth arising out of a report of need shall be immune from any civil or criminal liability on account of the report of need or testimony related to good faith compliance with this act. The immunity shall not extend to liability for an act of abuse of an older adult, even if the act is the subject of the report of need or testimony.(2) A facility that employs an individual required or permitted to make a report under this act shall not be held civilly liable for any action directly related to good faith compliance with this act.(3) In the absence of willful misconduct or gross negligence, the area agency on aging, the director or 20250HB1611PN1925 - 103 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 employees of the area agency on aging, protective services workers or employees of the department shall not be civilly or criminally liable for any decision or action or resulting consequence of a decision or action when acting under and according to the provisions of this act.Section 10. The department shall promulgate regulations to carry out the provisions of this act and shall annually present to the General Assembly a report on the program and services performed. Commonwealth agencies with oversight authority over entities impacted by this act shall promulgate regulations necessary to assist the department in implementing this act.Section 11. Nothing in this act shall be construed to expand the jurisdiction of or grant additional arrest powers to law enforcement officials that are not otherwise authorized by law.Section 12. All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as they are inconsistent with this act.Section 13. This act shall take effect as follows:(1) The following shall take effect immediately:The addition of sections 602-A, 603-A and 610-A of the act.This section.(2) The remainder of this act shall take effect in 18 months.20250HB1611PN1925 - 104 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223